Copyright


KUMO KAGYU

Translation by Kevin Steinbach Cover art by Noboru Kannatuki

This book is a work of fiction. Names, characters, places, and incidents are the product of the author’s imagination or are used fictitiously. Any resemblance to actual events, locales, or persons, living or dead, is coincidental.

GOBLIN SLAYER vol. 5

Copyright © 2017 Kumo Kagyu

Illustrations copyright © 2017 Noboru Kannatuki

All rights reserved.

Original Japanese edition published in 2017 by SB Creative Corp.

This English edition is published by arrangement with SB Creative Corp., Tokyo, in care of Tuttle-Mori Agency, Inc., Tokyo.

English translation © 2018 by Yen Press, LLC

Yen Press, LLC supports the right to free expression and the value of copyright. The purpose of copyright is to encourage writers and artists to produce the creative works that enrich our culture.

The scanning, uploading, and distribution of this book without permission is a theft of the author’s intellectual property. If you would like permission to use material from the book (other than for review purposes), please contact the publisher. Thank you for your support of the author’s rights.

Yen On

1290 Avenue of the Americas

New York, NY 10104

Visit us at yenpress.com

facebook.com/yenpress

twitter.com/yenpress

yenpress.tumblr.com

instagram.com/yenpress

First Yen On Edition: September 2018

Yen On is an imprint of Yen Press, LLC.

The Yen On name and logo are trademarks of Yen Press, LLC.

The publisher is not responsible for websites (or their content) that are not owned by the publisher.

Library of Congress Cataloging-in-Publication Data

Names: Kagyū, Kumo, author. | Kannatuki, Noboru, illustrator.

Title: Goblin slayer / Kumo Kagyu ; illustration by Noboru Kannatuki.

Other titles: Goburin sureiyā. English

Description: New York, NY : Yen On, 2016–

Identifiers: LCCN 2016033529 | ISBN 9780316501590 (v. 1 : pbk.) | ISBN 9780316553223 (v. 2 : pbk.) | ISBN 9780316553230 (v. 3 : pbk.) | ISBN 9780316411882 (v. 4 : pbk.) | ISBN 9781975326487 (v. 5 : pbk.)

Subjects: LCSH: Goblins—Fiction. | GSAFD: Fantasy fiction.

Classification: LCC PL872.5.A367 G6313 2016 | DDC 895.63/6—dc23

LC record available at https://lccn.loc.gov/2016033529

ISBNs: 978-1-9753-2648-7 (paperback)

978-1-9753-2783-5 (ebook)

E3-20180811-JV-PC





Contents


Cover

Insert

Title Page

Copyright

Chapter 1: Tutorial

Chapter 2: Mass Combat

Chapter 3: Hack and Slash

Chapter 4: Rebuild

Interlude: Of Those Who Were Waiting

Chapter 5: Dungeon Raid

Chapter 6: Goblins’ Crown

Interlude: Of the Gods Breathing a Sigh of Relief

Chapter 7: After Session—a New Dawn

Afterword

Yen Newsletter





O adventurer,

what tragedy that you should die.

Scant space there is on a tombstone.

O adventurer, your name I do not know,

but though you have not left it to us,

O adventurer, if you call me friend—

O my friend,

what tragedy that you should die.





“It went that way!”

A voice, clear as a bell, could be heard even over the blizzard that engulfed the battlefield.

It came from a young woman with sparkling blue eyes and beautiful, honey-colored waves of hair tied in two pigtails. She was an adventurer, but the nobility she displayed would not have been out of place at some lavish party.

Her face, which she might have covered in makeup at some point in her life, now ran with anxious sweat despite the surrounding snow. A cuirass protected her generous chest, while leather armor cradled a waist so slim she didn’t need a corset.

A silver sword glinted in her hand, a valuable family heirloom. It was made of aluminum, light and sharp, forged by a lightning-hammer against a red gem.

Thrust, thrust, block. She would repeat the motions she’d learned, again and again, and the enemy would have no hope of getting near her.

Beside her, a female warrior dove into the fray, speaking roughly but with an undercurrent of affection.

“I know! Just make sure you don’t slip and fall on the ice!”

“Gosh! I’m not that much of a klutz!”

That remained to be seen. The female warrior wore only thin armor, and pointed ears peeked out from beneath hair the color of leaves in autumn.





The half-elf brandished her thin sword; it flashed as she moved with steps like a dancer. The other girl, Noble Fencer, had chased off one enemy, and she wouldn’t miss the opening the foe’s fear afforded them.

“ORARARARAG?!”

“GAROARARA?!”

First one, then two, of the ugly little creatures died, dirty blood spewing from their chests, viscera exposed to the open air.

In the whole world, there was probably not a single person who wouldn’t recognize these monsters. Non-Prayers with dark green skin, crooked teeth, and the intelligence of cruel children. The weakest monster to walk the land: goblins.

They were visible here and there through the blizzard, growling or dribbling drool. They wore nothing but animal pelts over their bare skin; it wasn’t clear whether this was because the cold didn’t bother them or because they didn’t know any better way to warm themselves. For weapons they carried only stone axes or clubs, along with some crude spears made from shafts of bone.

Yet even so, they made no move to run from the adventurers. The goblins felt nothing but hostility, hatred, and lust for them.

“They’re so pathetic, it’s almost funny,” Noble Fencer said with a cute little snort.

“Heh-heh! Nice work, girls!”

A voice came from somewhere, sounding easy, unperturbed by the whipping snow.

The bright, almost innocent tone of it drew a frown from the half-elf.

“We’re not here to chat! Get to work!”

“Sure thing.”

With no sign or sound for warning, a dagger appeared, sinking into the space between a goblin’s ribs.

A backstab, straight through to the heart. The creature’s eyes went wide, and it dropped dead.

The corpse shifted from a little kick from behind; it fell forward, revealing a diminutive rhea scout. He braced himself against the body and pulled out the dagger he had buried in it.

But however stupid goblins may be, even they wouldn’t overlook an opportunity like that.

“Hrgh?!”

“GORBBB!!”

“GROOOB!!”

The monsters closed in, relying on their numbers for strength, waving their clubs. Giving a great yell, the rhea scout jumped backward.

“Don’t be getting distracted on the battlefield, now!” A small but sturdy figure pushed past the scout to protect him. The dwarf wore a monk’s habit and had the look of a boulder. His weapon of choice was a war hammer. The block of metal smashed mercilessly into a goblin’s skull, sending brains flying everywhere, releasing the creature’s nasty little soul to the afterlife.

“Well, I’m very sorry, Lord Monk!”

“Think nothing of it,” the dwarf replied evenly, brushing an eyeball off his hammer. “Hey, spell casters. We’ve still got one or two in the distance there.”

“Of course. I can see them perfectly well.”

The response came from a middle-aged wizard dressed in the plainest of pure white robes. The human had an incongruous smile on his face while he stroked his own forehead as if to imply his abundant wisdom. A hand emerged from his robe, quickly forming a sign, while he brandished his staff with an expert gesture.

“My dear noble girl, perhaps you could lend me a hand?”

“You’ve got it!” Noble Fencer puffed out her chest and nodded. On her lovely finger was a ring that shone with a jewel, and she and the wizard spoke words of true power together.

“Sagitta…quelta…raedius! Strike home, arrow!”

“Tonitrus…oriens…iacta! Rise and fall, thunder!”

The words overwhelmed the very logic of the world, and the twin spells assaulted the goblins: the wizard’s Magic Missile sent several supernatural arrows flying, while Noble Fencer’s Lightning spell thundered down on them, turning snow to steam.

Afterward, the only goblins that remained were filled with holes or fried to a crisp. The ground had been laid bare by the attack, but the snow continued to come down without mercy. It would only be a matter of time before the earth was covered again.

“Well, I guess that’s it,” the half-elf warrior said, shaking the blood off her blade and sheathing it.

Rhea Scout whistled. “Aren’t you in a good mood.”

“Can’t say I’m very happy about you letting your guard down,” Dwarf Monk said reproachfully, but the wizard broke in, “Oh, spells cure all ills. It turned out all right in the end.”

The party, having successfully survived a random encounter with a group of goblins, once again patted themselves on the back for their battle prowess. They had cooperated well, and no one had been hurt. True, they had resorted to some spells, but still, a flawless victory.

The adventurers’ eyes burned with a passion that resembled both hope and ambition at once. Behind them was the northern village and all its defenseless residents, who lived under the threat of monsters. Ahead of them was the mountain, dangerous and severe but majestically white and snowcapped nonetheless. Somewhere on its slopes was the entrance to an underground cave.

It didn’t matter if they had to fight goblins. In fact, all the more reason to go. If goblin slaying wasn’t adventuring, what was?

“Yeah, don’t worry,” Noble Fencer said boldly, her golden hair whipping in the wind. She turned to her fellows and announced, “I have a plan!”





Dear Goblin Slayer,

I hope this letter finds you well. The season of snow sprites has come, and the cold with it. An adventurer’s health is his most important resource at this time of the year. Please take care not to get sick.

As for me, I’m surprised but happy to say that after our last encounter, I have had no dreams of goblins, and in fact, things have been quite peaceful. It’s all thanks to you and your friends. I send you my heartfelt gratitude. I should like to have written sooner and am embarrassed that I cannot even plead busyness to excuse the belatedness of this letter.

Nor do I feel it’s quite appropriate for me to immediately trouble you again—so I must ask your forgiveness, for that is exactly what I intend to do. It so happens that there is a quest I would like to ask you to take on.

It’s a common enough story: a certain young noblewoman fled her parents’ house to become an adventurer. She took on a quest, after which all communication from her ceased—a sad, but also not uncommon, outcome. That one of her parents visited the Guild to offer a quest to find the girl isn’t special, either.

The one thing I wish to note is that the quest the girl had undertaken was a goblin-slaying one.

I’m sure you see where this is going.

The search quest her parents filed specifies that “the most reliable, high-ranked adventurers” should apply. But of course, hardly anyone in the advanced ranks takes on goblin-slaying quests. When the Guild consulted me on the matter, I could think of no one besides you.

Knowing you, I’m sure you’re quite busy (I heard about what went on at the harvest festival), but if you should have a few spare moments, I would ask that you use them to extend help to an unfortunate young woman.

I pray for your good health and safety.

Yours,

“It’s from Sword Maiden. She says she’s praying for you… Human letters are so passionate.” An elf’s cheerful voice sounded brightly on the winter road.

The road stretched on and on across the windswept plain. The only things that could be seen were dead trees and snow-covered shrubs all the way out to the horizon. The sky had been painted a dull gray by great, broad strokes of cloud; there was nothing of interest to look at anywhere.

In this drab world, the elf’s lively, happy voice stood out. Her thin form was cloaked in hunter’s garb. A bow was slung across her back, and her long ears twitched playfully.

High Elf Archer’s catlike curiosity was by no means limited to adventures. She gave the letter in her hand a jaunty fold, gripped it in her long fingers, and passed it back behind her.

“I haven’t seen many letters. Are they all like this?” she asked.

“Hmm…”

The human girl she passed the letter to gave an ambiguous smile, looking a bit shy. Even as she took the piece of paper, she seemed hesitant to read it.

Her willowy body was covered in mail, over which hung clerical garments, and in her hand, she held a sounding staff: she was a priestess. That was it—this missive had the whiff of a love letter. It would be wrong to say she didn’t wonder about it, but she also didn’t quite feel comfortable reading someone else’s mail. If someone did it to her, she would find it very difficult to come back from.

“But… But it has gotten very cold, hasn’t it?”

So instead, she resolved to change the subject of the conversation, by force if necessary.

The farther north they got, the heavier the clouds in the sky became, until sunlight couldn’t penetrate them. The wind was growing bitter, and sometimes it brought something white with it.

It was winter. That was made obvious enough by the snow that had started to pile up along the road.

“I’m chilly,” Priestess said. “Maybe it’s my own fault. Mail isn’t going to help me keep warm…”

“This is why metal products are no good!” High Elf Archer gave a triumphant chuckle and stuck out her little chest, her ears bobbing up and down proudly. It was true: her hunter’s cloak had nothing metal on it.

“Pipe down,” a dwarf spell caster said. “Frankly, I’m amazed you’re comfortable in clothing so thin.”

“What’s that I hear? Are elves tougher than you thought?”

“Tough and slow to catch colds are different things, lassie,” the dwarf said, stroking his beard, provoking an angry “What?!” from the red-faced elf.

Their friendly argument was just as boisterous as ever. Priestess smiled. “Some things never change!”

“Mm,” a massive lizardman nodded from beside her. “I envy them the energy to make such a commotion.” The blood of his ancestors, the fearsome nagas, flowed in his veins—and he was from the southern tribe. Lizard Priest’s scaly body shivered in the freezing cold of the snow.

Priestess found this hard to watch and looked up at him with worry. “Are you okay?”

“It’s a question of my ancestors, who were equally vulnerable to cold. I could be facing extinction.” Lizard Priest rolled his huge eyes and his tongue flicked out of his mouth. He continued in a joking tone, “Milord Goblin Slayer seems calm enough. You’ve had a good deal of experience of this, I suppose.”

“…No.”

Lizard Priest had spoken to a human warrior who led the column. He wore grimy leather armor and a cheap-looking steel helmet. A sword of a strange length was at his hip, and a small, round shield was tied to his arm. Even a novice adventurer would probably have had better equipment.

Goblin Slayer: that was what people called this adventurer, a man of the third rank, Silver.

The only thing that was different from usual was the crudely wrought arrows he held in each hand.

“I first learned my trade on a snowy mountain.” He worked on the arrowheads as he walked, not looking back at his companions.

“Oh-ho,” Lizard Priest said admiringly. “Not a kind of practice I could imitate.” His tail swished.

Goblin Slayer didn’t slacken his pace as he said, “I wouldn’t want to do it again.”

As ever, there was no hesitation in his stride; he walked boldly, with an almost nonchalant violence.

“Um, Goblin Slayer, sir!” Priestess came rushing up to him with little steps like a small bird, clutching her staff in both hands. “Thank you, um, for this.” Apologizing for making him interrupt his work, she passed the letter back to him. It was a good opportunity, since High Elf Archer and Dwarf Shaman were still occupied with arguing.

“You understand the gist of the quest?” He held the arrows in one hand, blithely taking the letter with the other and folding it up. Priestess caught a brief glimpse inside his item pouch as he put the letter away. As usual, it was stuffed with all manner of seemingly random things. But for him, there was an order to it, an organization, and he no doubt considered everything in there to be necessary.

Maybe I should try to organize my items a little more carefully, too…

Priestess made a mental note to ask him about it and nodded. “Um… We need to rescue the woman, right? From the goblins.”

“That’s right.” Goblin Slayer nodded. “In other words, it’s a goblin-slaying quest.”

And that, more or less, was all there was to it. Shortly after the harvest festival in the frontier town, a letter had arrived from the water town. It was from the archbishop of the Supreme God there—known as Sword Maiden—and just as before, it addressed Goblin Slayer by name.

This eccentric adventurer would certainly not turn down any work involving goblins. And so Priestess, who had brought word to them from the temple, along with High Elf Archer, Dwarf Shaman, and Lizard Priest, headed north with Goblin Slayer.

It was early afternoon, and they would soon arrive at the little village at the foot of the snowy mountain.

“I hope the girl’s all right…”

“Yeah. I hate to think about it…” High Elf Archer, apparently having tired of arguing, waved her hand as if to shoo away the awful idea. Her tone was light, but her drooping ears spoke for the sadness she felt. “Honestly, I doubt any goblin hostage is safe.”

“Well… Uh…”

Priestess and High Elf Archer gave each other stiff smiles, and it was clear what they were remembering.

“If she’s alive, we’ll rescue her. If she’s dead, we’ll bring back part of the corpse, or her personal effects.”

Such horrors, of course, were by no means the special province of goblins. Be it goblins or be it a dragon, no adventurer was safe in the clutches of any monster. So Goblin Slayer’s response was perfectly natural. He spoke in a quiet, detached—almost mechanical—voice. “Regardless, we’ll kill the goblins. That is the quest.”

“…There’s got to be a nicer way to say all that,” High Elf Archer said with understandable annoyance, but Goblin Slayer didn’t appear to notice.

“What can we do?” Priestess said with a little shrug and a helpless smile.

Lizard Priest broke in with fortuitous timing, not that he was necessarily trying to make things easier on the girls.

“I wonder what reason goblins would have for attacking a village in the middle of winter.” His huge body shivered, almost theatrically, as if to emphasize the cold. “Would it not be more pleasant for them to stay quietly in their caves?”

“Well, Scaly, it’s just like with bears, isn’t it?” Dwarf Shaman answered, stroking his white beard. He unstoppered the flask at his hip, taking a swig and then holding it out to Lizard Priest. “Here. Warm up your insides a bit.”

“Ah! You have my gratitude.” The priest opened his huge jaws and took a gulp, then replaced the stopper and handed the flask back to Dwarf Shaman.

The dwarf gave the container a shake, listening to the slosh to judge how much was left, then put it back at his hip. “Y’need plenty of food and drink and sweets stored up to make it through the winter.”

“Oh? Then it seems like autumn would be a better time to attack a village.” High Elf Archer spun her finger in a circle in the air and, with all the confidence of the ranger she was, said, “That’s what bears and other hibernating animals do.”

“But even bears sneak out once in a while in the winter,” Dwarf Shaman said. “What about that?”

“Sometimes they don’t have a choice, like if they can’t find a good cave to sleep in, or if the harvest was poor in the fall.”

No one knew more than elves when it came to hunting and trapping. So much so that even the argumentative dwarf could only mutter, “I suppose that makes sense,” and nod.

The conversation caused Priestess to put a finger to her lips thoughtfully and mutter, “Hmm.” She felt like she had all the pieces in her head. Now she only had to put them together…

“Oh!” she exclaimed when the insight struck her.

“What’s up?” High Elf Archer asked.

“Maybe,” Priestess answered, “it’s exactly because the harvest festival is just over.”

Yes, that has to be it. Even as she spoke, she grew more and more sure.

“The harvest is over,” she went on, “so the storehouses in the villages and towns are full. And the goblins—”

“—want it all for themselves,” Lizard Priest said, finishing her thought.

“Right,” Priestess said with a small nod.

“I see. So even goblins are capable of the occasional logical decision.”

“More likely they’re just trying to cause the most possible trouble,” Dwarf Shaman said, tugging at his beard.

“No,” Goblin Slayer said, shaking his head. “Goblins are stupid, but they’re not fools.”

“You sound pretty sure about that,” High Elf Archer said.

“I am,” Goblin Slayer said, nodding this time. “Goblins think of nothing but stealing, but they do apply their intelligence to their theft.”

He took a close look at the arrows he had been working with, then put them into a quiver at his hip. He appeared satisfied with the work he had done as they walked. “I’ve experienced it.”

“I see…,” Priestess said with some admiration.

High Elf Archer threw in her own hmm, but it wasn’t his words she was interested in. What had drawn her attention were the bow and arrows—which she normally considered her own specialty.

“…So, Orcbolg, what were you doing with those arrows?”

“Preparing them.”

“Oh, really?” She reached out with a motion so smooth it could barely be sensed and took one of the arrows out of the quiver.

“Be careful.” That Goblin Slayer stopped with a warning and didn’t scold the elf showed he was used to her curiosity. He did, however, sound somewhat annoyed.

High Elf Archer sniffed in acknowledgment and inspected the arrow. It was a perfectly normal cheap bolt. The quality was not remotely comparable to an elvish arrow. The head had a murky sparkle in the winter sun. High Elf Archer tapped it lightly with her finger.

“Doesn’t seem like it’s poisoned or anything…”

“Not today.”

“Aw, be nice!” The elf frowned at the brusque words but made a sound of interest as she turned the arrow around. “The arrowhead isn’t fastened securely. It’s gonna fall off, you know.”

And indeed, it was just as High Elf Archer said. Perhaps because of Goblin Slayer’s fiddling with it, the tip of the cheap arrow was no longer fixed in place. Even if he managed to hit his target, the arrowhead might well break off, and it would almost certainly come down at the wrong angle.

“Orcbolg, you are hopeless.” High Elf Archer gave a broad shrug and a shake of her head, adding, “Sheesh,” for effect.

She decided to ignore the dwarf behind her, who said, “You’re showing your age.”

“Here, give me that quiver. I’ll fix them for you.”

She held out her hand, but Goblin Slayer just looked at it. Then he said, “No,” and shook his head. “They’re fine.”

High Elf Archer stared at him blankly. “How’s that?”

“Because we don’t yet know where the goblins are sleeping this time.”

“And that’s connected to these arrows how?”

It makes no sense!

When there was something High Elf Archer didn’t agree with, she could be awfully prickly about it.

They had known each other for nearly a year now. Goblin Slayer sighed. “When the arrow hits, the shaft breaks off, leaving only the head.”

“So?”

“The head will be poisonous.” He held out his hand. High Elf Archer grunted and politely returned the arrow. Goblin Slayer put it gently back in the quiver. “So long as they don’t take it out, but simply go back to their hole, their flesh will begin to rot, and the sickness will spread.”

And goblins had no knowledge of medicine—at least for now.

A cramped, dirty nest. Wounds that wouldn’t heal. Rot. A wasting disease. That meant…

“It probably won’t kill them all, but it will be a major blow.”

“As usual, Orcbolg, your plan makes no sense to me,” High Elf Archer muttered, her face drawn. Beside her, Priestess looked up to the heavens as if in distress.

Gods. O gods. He doesn’t mean ill…well, except to goblins. But please, forgive him.

It was much too late for her to be shocked at anything he said or did, but still, she felt compelled to offer the occasional prayer.

Goblin Slayer, moving at a quick clip, looked at her. “Are you that surprised?”

“…Er, well, uh…” Priestess couldn’t quite decide where to look. “I mean, this being you, Goblin Slayer, sir…”

“Is that so?” he said quietly, evoking a laugh from Lizard Priest.

“Do not let it bother you. It is certainly most like milord Goblin Slayer.”

“True, it’s not like we had any illusions about how Beard-cutter thinks.” Dwarf Shaman took the flask from his hip and took a swig of wine to ward off the cold. Fire wine could practically burn; it was enough to put the smell of alcohol in the air.

High Elf Archer choked quietly, pinching her nose with one hand and waving away the smell with the other. Dwarf Shaman wiped some droplets from his beard.

“We’ve still got no answer to our original concern,” he said.

“Original concern?” Goblin Slayer asked. “Which one is that?”

“There’s no way the girl is unharmed.”

“You mean the chances that the kidnapped girl is still alive.”

“Right.” He looked at Goblin Slayer and wiped more vigorously at his beard. “They’re apt to eat her, aren’t they? Otherwise they only have another mouth to feed. They’ve no reason to let her live through the winter.”

“Winter is long,” Goblin Slayer said, nodding. He spoke coldly. “They’ll want something to pass the time.”

Not much later, they noticed a single column of smoke rising from the village at the base of the mountain.

§

“Orcbolg…!”

High Elf Archer was the first to speak, her ears twitching.

Down the road, not far away, some smoke was rising. Perhaps it was from a cook fire? No.

“Goblins?”

“A village. Fire. Smoke. The smell of burning. Noise, screams… It seems likely!”

“So it’s goblins.”

Goblin Slayer nodded in response, and without a moment’s hesitation he took the little bow off his back. Moving quickly now, he tugged on the string with a practiced hand, then nocked an arrow and drew.

No one had to give the order: the entire party followed after him immediately. The goblins attacking the village were hell-bent on thievery; they hadn’t even posted any sentries and didn’t yet know of the approaching adventurers.

How would the party punish the goblins for foolishly giving them such an advantage?

“Goblin Slayer, sir,” Priestess said seriously, despite her hard breathing and a face drawn with nervousness, “should I prepare my miracles…?”

“Do it.”

“Right!”

Priestess had been an adventurer for a year already. True, all she had done was slay goblins, but the density of her adventures was far greater than most novices. That was why she didn’t have to ask which miracle to prepare but only whether she ought to get ready. She had, after all, known Goblin Slayer longer than any of the other party members.

“O Earth Mother, abounding in mercy, by the power of the land grant safety to we who are weak.”

She held her sounding staff to her chest and prayed imploringly to her goddess. It was an activity intense enough to shave away part of her soul. A true miracle, one which allowed her consciousness to touch that of the gods in heaven.

A faint but pure light came down from the sky, embracing Goblin Slayer and Lizard Priest. This was the miracle Protection, which had saved Goblin Slayer and the others in more than one moment of crisis.

Lizard Priest ran, kicking off the ground, narrowing his eyes as the phosphorescence surrounded him.

“Hmm! Your Earth Mother is indeed capable of miracles. If she were a naga, perhaps I would convert to her worship. Now, then…”

He had already finished his prayer to his terrible forebears, the nagas, and a fang polished like a blade was in his hand. Lizard Priest had agility enough to charge the foe at any moment. Now he looked suspiciously at the village and called out, “Milord Goblin Slayer, shall we attack the goblins or protect the villagers?”

He answered calmly, “Both, of course.”

High Elf Archer let out an admiring exhalation. She looked every inch the tracker as she ran along, bow in hand.

Even as he assessed the situation himself, Goblin Slayer said to Lizard Priest, “How does it look to you?”

“…Not very good, I fear.” The lizard was a veteran warrior priest, and his judgment carried the ring of authority. “I don’t hear the clanging of swords. That means the battle is over; they’re focused on stealing now.”

“If they think they’ve won, that will make them vulnerable. We don’t know their strength, but…”

But that was normal for this party. Goblin Slayer didn’t hesitate.

“We go in from the front.”

“Dragontooth Warriors?”

“No. I’ll explain why later.” Then Goblin Slayer picked up his pace. Priestess had her hands full trying to keep up, while Dwarf Shaman stuck out his chin, running along as fast as he could.

Goblin Slayer was not one to deceive. If he said he would explain, then he would. That was why none of the party members objected. Anyway, there wasn’t time to argue. Their party didn’t have a leader as such, but when it came to fighting goblins, who else were they going to follow?

“Don’t use potions. But don’t hold back with your spells.”

“You’ve got it!” The answer came from their spell caster, Dwarf Shaman. “I s’pose it’s up to me which spells I use?” As he dashed along as fast as his little legs would carry him, the dwarf was already reaching into his bag and rifling through his catalysts.

Even if there were a great many enemies, the chances of one who could use magic were slim—and not just because they were dealing with goblins. It was simply the way of the world. The fact that three of their five party members were spell casters was a sign of how blessed they were.

“Yes, I’ll leave it to you.” Goblin Slayer nodded, then glanced at High Elf Archer. “Find high ground and see what’s going on. You’ll be our support.”

“Sounds good.” She gave a smile of satisfaction like a happy cat. With an elegant motion, she prepared her huge bow and set an arrow.

Everything was ready. Keeping his eyes forward as they advanced, Goblin Slayer said, “First, one.”

An arrow flew soundlessly through the air, burying itself in the base of the skull of a goblin who stood lolling at the entrance to the village.

“ORAAG?!”

The brain-dead goblin pitched forward, but it wasn’t clear whether any of his companions noticed.

“N-nooo!! Help—help me!! Sis! Big siiiiis!!”

For at that moment, they were busy dragging a girl out of a barrel where she’d been hiding. She screamed and kicked, but they had her by the hair; the goblins didn’t seem to have grasped the situation yet.

At the same instant that the first goblin fell dead, bud-tipped arrows began to fall like rain, sprouting from eyes and necks.

“Hey, Orcbolg! No fair starting early!” High Elf Archer, her lips pursed, offered almost as many complaints as she did arrows. Once she had shot down the goblins, she jumped, from barrel, to pillar, to roof. It was a feat that could only have been possible for an elf, born and raised in the trees, an incredible display of acrobatics.

“What? Huh…?” The village girl stared in disbelief.

As Goblin Slayer ran up, he said briefly, “We’re adventurers.”

The girl was still young—she could hardly have been older than ten. Her clothes were plain but made of fur; she had clearly been well cared for. When she saw the silver tag that hung around Goblin Slayer’s neck, her eyes welled up with tears.

Silver. That meant an adventurer of the third rank. An adventurer’s rank represented his abilities, as well as how much social good he had done. It was the most important form of identification on the frontier.

Goblin Slayer wasn’t distracted for a second; he looked around, speaking quickly. “Where are the goblins? How many are there? What happened to the other villagers?”

“Er, um, I—that is, I don’t… I don’t know…” Terror and regret drained the color from the girl’s face, and she shook her head. “But—everyone—they all assembled in the village square… My older sister, she said… She said to hide…”

“I don’t like it,” Goblin Slayer spat, readying a new arrow from his quiver. “I don’t like any of it.”

His whisper contained a wealth of emotions. Priestess gave him a searching glance, but it didn’t stop her from kneeling in front of the young girl.

“It’s all right,” she said. “We’ll help your sister, I’m sure of it.”

“Really?”

“Really!” Priestess pounded herself on her little chest and gave a smile like a blooming flower. She patted the shivering girl gently on the head, looking into her eyes as she showed her the symbol of the Earth Mother. “See? I serve the goddess. And—”

Yes, and.

Priestess shook her head. The girl followed her gaze as she looked up. The grimy armor. The cheap-looking helmet. A human warrior.

“And Goblin Slayer would never lose to a goblin.”

Goblin Slayer glanced at the girl and Priestess, then glowered at the village, where the sounds of thieving could be heard.

“The enemy still hasn’t noticed us. Let’s do it.”

“Wait—there is danger.” Lizard Priest somberly offered his view of the situation. “Goblins or not, the enemy seems to be organized. We must not presume too much.”

“Their willingness to attack in broad daylight suggests there may be advanced types of goblins with them,” Goblin Slayer said.

So perhaps they should not let any information get back to the nest.

After a moment, Goblin Slayer took the arrows, meant to kill slowly, and returned them to his back. In exchange, he drew the familiar sword with its strange length.

“I don’t want to risk any of them escaping, but it will be difficult to keep them bottled up in the square.”

“In that case, let me handle the town square—take ’em all out with magic.” Dwarf Shaman pounded his belly like a drum.

“Hmm,” Goblin Slayer murmured, rolling the goblin corpse onto its back with his foot.

A crude pelt. For a weapon, a hatchet it must have stolen from somewhere. Its color was good; it showed no sign of starving.

“It depends on the numbers.” Goblin Slayer grabbed the hatchet from the goblin’s hand, fixing it at his hip. He looked up and saw High Elf Archer waving from the rooftops. Her long ears were twitching; she must have been trying to read the situation by the sound.

“Five or six of them in the square!” she called out in a clear, carrying voice, and Goblin Slayer nodded.

“How many are there in the village as a whole? Even just that you can see.”

“There are lots of shadows, so it’s hard to count. But I’d say not more than twenty.”

“So this is just an advance unit,” Goblin Slayer said and quickly began to formulate a strategy.

Assume there were fewer than twenty goblins, including the three they’d killed earlier. There were six in the square. That meant fewer than fourteen around the perimeter, engaged in looting. It was only a guess, but it probably wasn’t far off.

In the face of large enemy numbers, splitting your own force was the stupidest thing you could do, but the situation was what it was.

“We split up. Square and perimeter.”

“In that case, I shall head to the square with master spell caster,” Lizard Priest offered.

“All right.” Goblin Slayer nodded.

High Elf Archer, who had heard the conversation from her place on the rooftop, spoke without taking her eyes or ears off the village. “I guess I’ll run support for you, dwarf!”

“Sounds good, Long-Ears!” Dwarf Shaman took a swig from his flask and wiped his mouth on his gauntlet, then he pounded Lizard Priest’s belly like a drum. “Right then, Scaly! Shall we go?”

As he left, Lizard Priest thumped Goblin Slayer on the shoulder with one powerful hand. “I wish you success in battle, milord Goblin Slayer.”

“……”

Goblin Slayer said nothing but finally nodded and began to move. His stride was nonchalant, but his footsteps made no sound. He was approaching the side of the house, where Priestess was with the little girl they had saved.

“…Is the girl all right?”

“Yes. I think she’s a little less frightened now…” Priestess gave an optimistic smile. Across from her, the girl was curled up on the ground, fast asleep. Adventurers had come, and she had told them about her sister—perhaps she needed a break from consciousness after all that.

“What should we do…?”

“We have no more time to worry about her.”

“Oh…” But before she could say anything more, a rough, gloved hand picked the girl up. Goblin Slayer deposited her in the nearby barrel. Then he pulled a blanket from his bag and laid it over her. She wasn’t exactly safe, but this was the spot her older sister had chosen. Perhaps it would help her relax.

Where were the Earth Mother and the Supreme God that they would not answer the prayers of a little girl?

“…This will have to do,” Goblin Slayer muttered.

“Right,” Priestess said with a little nod. Her right hand held her sounding staff, but the left wandered through the air, until she placed it hesitatingly on Goblin Slayer’s back. “I’m sure…it’s fine.”

“…Yes.” Goblin Slayer nodded. Then he strengthened his grip on his sword, raised his shield, and looked ahead. The village was burning, and there were goblins to slay. “Let’s go.”

“Yes, sir!” Priestess answered without hesitation while gripping her staff with both hands. She would not object to anything he asked her to do. After all, he was the person who had saved her life.

She was all too aware that her abilities were not yet great, that she was still woefully inexperienced. But even so—

“Don’t worry. I’ll watch your back!”

Thus, the battle began.

§

Goblin Slayer and Priestess slid like shadows along a snowy path lined with log houses. The sun, peeking intermittently through the clouds, had already begun to sink, and soon it would be twilight. The goblins’ hour. This village didn’t have much time left.

Priestess gulped air as she ran. “I’ve never fought…in a village before…”

“There aren’t nearly as many obstacles as in a cave. Watch the shadows and watch out for attacks from above.” Even as he spoke, Goblin Slayer lifted his sword and flung it. It flew through the air, piercing the chest of a goblin who had scrambled up onto a rooftop.

“ORAAG?!”

The creature screamed and tumbled to the ground. Goblin Slayer pulled a hatchet from his belt. A flick of his wrist brought it down harder than a one-handed sword. He buried it in the skull of the goblin writhing on the ground.

“GAAROROROOOOOOORG?!”

It gave a long, choked death knell. Goblin Slayer seemed pleased by the sound. Not bad.

“That makes four.”

“Since there are six in the square, that means less than ten left, doesn’t it?”

Priestess squeezed her eyes shut, offering a prayer to the Earth Mother that the tiny demon might not lose his way on the road to the afterlife.

All mortal beings died once and once only; in this, everyone was the same. Death was the kindest and most equal thing in this world.

“Yes. And we don’t have much time to search.” Goblin Slayer jogged up to an intersection, then moved close to Priestess as if asking her to watch his back. To be suddenly so close to him—her heart began to race, even though she knew this was entirely platonic.

“They’ll have noticed the scream. They’ll be coming soon. Get ready.”

“Oh, r-right!”

Priestess nodded, gripped her sounding staff firmly, and brought her hands together at her chest.

Perhaps it was all the running and the nervousness that accounted for her elevated heart rate and her strangely hot face. There was no time for idle thoughts now, she told herself.

“Watch your feet. If you slip on the snow, you’ll die. And watch out for poisoned blades.”

“Right. Um…” Priestess looked at him questioningly. Cover. Overhead. Her feet and poisoned weapons. “So what you really mean is… Just watch out for everything, like usual.”

“Mm,” Goblin Slayer grunted.

She felt him nod rather than saw it, and it brought a smile to her face.

“That’s not much in the way of guidance.”

“Sorry.”

“Gosh. You… You really are hopeless, aren’t you?” She giggled, but it was mostly in hopes of masking how scared she was.

This was only one of many times when she and Goblin Slayer had fought together, just the two of them. But it was, perhaps, the first time she had been in the front with him like this.

Their party included five people now. Goblin Slayer was their only front-line specialist, but Lizard Priest was a fighter as well. A rearguard specialist like herself had very few chances to experience the full brunt of combat. She had to admit that every once in a while, she had grown impatient being protected by everyone else, but still…

It doesn’t matter. I have to make sure to do my job.

And anyway, she appreciated that everyone looked out for her.

She gripped her staff even tighter; she saw forms moving, obscured by the drifting snow.

“Looks like they’re here…”

“Make small movements with your weapon. All I need is a distraction. I can strike the finishing blow.”

“Yes, sir…!”

And then there was no more time for conversation.

The goblins, seeing that their opponents numbered only two, and one of them a woman, assaulted the intersection from all four directions at once.

“GAAORRR!!”

“GROOB!!”

“Five…!” Goblin Slayer said, striking the first goblin to attack with his hatchet as easily as if he were chopping firewood.

“GOROB?!”

The monster fell to the ground, the hatchet still buried in his forehead. Without slowing down, Goblin Slayer turned his shield on the creature to the left. The sharpened, polished edge doubled as a weapon, and it evoked a strangled cry from the second goblin when it split his head open.

The second creature stumbled back. Goblin Slayer didn’t hesitate to grab the dagger the goblin had stashed in his dirty loincloth.

“Hrr!”

He kicked the goblin in the stomach and sent him flying, then channeled the momentum into throwing the dagger he had stolen. It flew straight to a goblin who was rushing toward them with a pike. The creature began to claw at the dagger that had suddenly sprouted from his throat, then collapsed.

“Six.”

He stepped on the body of the first goblin he had killed and pulled out the hatchet, then promptly planted it in the head of the unfortunate second creature, who had been struggling to get up.

“Seven!”

The fight was many against only two—but one of those two was Goblin Slayer. He focused on what was in front of him, leaving his otherwise vulnerable back to Priestess. There were no walls for the monsters to attack from; he could see in all four directions, and that was all he needed. There was no enemy easier to overpower than goblins who had left their territory.

“Hah! Yah!”

Priestess, sweat beading on her forehead, was making small, quick movements with her staff. They were not unlike the dance she had learned for the ritual she performed at the festival; she drew on her long hours of practice as she fought.

She wasn’t dealing the goblins any serious blows; she was just keeping them at bay. Making sure they stayed back. Giving them something to think about. She only wanted to ensure they didn’t get too close. She might have been able to keep them back even farther if she made larger swings, but that risked one of them finding an opening, and then it would all be over.

Besides, I’ve got Goblin Slayer behind me.

He was watching her back, and she was watching his. She felt both relief and a sense of duty, the two mingling in a strange excitement.

“Ah…!” Suddenly, she felt Goblin Slayer begin to move to the right. Without a moment’s hesitation, she followed him. They turned, as if in a dance, so that he was now facing where she had been.

“Eight… Nine!”

Goblin Slayer’s hatchet began mowing down the goblins Priestess had held off. No matter how many times she heard it, the girl could never quite get used to the sound of a heavy blade cutting through flesh and bone. Especially not when she was faced with goblins, their eyes alight with greed and hatred, crawling over the corpses of their companions to get at her.

The bone-chilling terror of that first adventure still hadn’t left her. And it likely never would.

“Ya—ah?!”

There was a thock as one of the goblins caught the end of her sounding staff. A moment’s struggle soon began to tell in favor of the goblin. Even the weak monster could overpower Priestess’s thin arms. With his strength, the goblin could easily pull her off her feet, claw at her throat.

Priestess went pale; the image of one of her former party members, a female wizard who had met a gruesome end, flashed in the back of her mind.

“O Earth Mother, abounding in mercy, grant your sacred light to we who are lost in darkness!”

“GORRUURUAAAA?!?!”

But she wouldn’t let it end that way. She had gained a great deal of experience since then. The Holy Light miracle seared the goblin’s eyes without mercy. The creature fell back, clutching his face, and Priestess’s staff nearly jumped back at her.

The miracle didn’t do any damage, but everything had its uses. Those without imagination were the first to die. That was something she had learned from Goblin Slayer.

“Ten…!”

And Goblin Slayer, of course, was not one to miss a goblin who had left him an opening. The hatchet seemed to trade places with her; it sliced clean through the goblin’s throat. The monster spasmed and rolled on the ground. Its neck hung at a strange angle. Another blow. The last one.

Goblin Slayer produced this pile of corpses as naturally as breathing. Now, he turned expressionlessly to Priestess.

“Are you hurt?”

“N-no.”

His question was as direct as always. Priestess quickly patted herself down to be sure. Even if she didn’t think she was injured, it was possible she had sustained a graze somewhere. With the goblins using poisoned weapons, even a small wound could be deadly.

“I—I think I’m all right.”

“I see.” Goblin Slayer nodded. He inspected the bloody hatchet and gave a soft cluck of his tongue. It wasn’t greasy, but the blade was beginning to dull from cutting through so much bone. He tossed it away and, for the second time, drew the little bow on his back.

Almost as an afterthought, he said, “Holy Light. That was a good choice.”

“Huh…?” It took her a moment to figure out what he was talking about. Is he…praising me? “Oh! Uh—um, th-thank you…?” He really is, isn’t he?

She felt a happy warmth start in her cheeks, but before it could spread any further, she suppressed the smile that loomed. “Heh-heh.”

Just that little chuckle escaped her. This was no time to savor the compliment. Instead, she kept her face neutral, gripped her staff almost imploringly, and offered up prayers for the dead. Goblin Slayer wouldn’t stop her from doing that.

“Three earlier, seven here, and this one makes ten.” He had an arrow ready and was scanning the area.

Close inspection of the mud- and blood-soaked path revealed a number of bodies on the ground. Most of them were human, but several were goblins. The villagers must have resisted. The monsters appeared to have been killed with hoes or similar farming tools. There were two—no, three more—goblin corpses.

“The final count is thirteen, then.”

Goblin Slayer went around kicking each of the bodies to be sure they were dead. One of the corpses dropped a dagger; he picked it up and put it in his belt. He wasn’t discriminating when it came to weapons. A single stone could kill a goblin. Even barehanded, there were ways. Still, there were times when a real weapon was the decisive factor. It was important to collect whenever the opportunity arose.

“We said there were five or six in the square, as I recall.”

“That would make eighteen or nineteen total, right?” Priestess had finished her prayers; she stood up, brushing the dust from her knees.

Goblin Slayer’s expression was hidden behind his helmet, but Priestess, for her part, looked confused. “Not quite twenty…”

“I don’t like the way they’re keeping all their hostages in one place, either. Nor do I like how the corpses of the villagers who fought back appear unmolested.”

Priestess put a finger thoughtfully to her lips, then murmured, “It’s not very…goblin-like, is it?”

Many things had happened in caves and ruins and other deep places that she didn’t want to recall. But whenever and wherever goblins overcame their enemies, they tended to have their sport with them right then and there. They saw such places as their nests, so to speak. Territory where they could relax. And the more someone fought back, the more violent and cruel the goblins became.

Goblins were cunning and cowardly, mean and vicious, and above all they were loyal to their appetites. They probably didn’t even know what it meant to put off gratifying their own desires. For them to take hostages on enemy ground, and then continue looting without laying a hand on their captives…

“Do you suppose there’s another ogre or dark elf behind this?”

“I don’t know,” Goblin Slayer said. “It could just be goblins.”

He spoke in a manner very characteristic of him; for some reason, Priestess found this reassuring. Goblin Slayer was a little twisted, a little strange, a mite bizarre, and certainly stubborn. She had often been in a great deal of danger during her year with him. And sometimes, she felt that she couldn’t leave him alone or that he was hopeless.

“You might be right,” she said, and her voice was very gentle. But then…

“Huh…?”

Something tickled her nose, a barely detectable odor on the wind. A sweet, stimulating aroma much like alcohol.

“He must be using Stupor,” she said.

“So he decided to put the hostages and the goblins all to sleep.” Goblin Slayer looked around, then toward the town square, where the smell was presumably coming from. Indeed: smoke was rising from the area, too much to have been caused by anything but magic.

“Very efficient.”

“Ha… Ah-ha-ha-ha…” A tight smile came over Priestess’s face, and she looked away.

Nothing more efficient than putting an entire nest to sleep. Sure…

She thought the words but didn’t say them.

§

“Orcbolg, I thought you’d never get here!”

“Did you?”

High Elf Archer had her little chest puffed out; Goblin Slayer answered her with a hint of annoyance. When he and Priestess had arrived, the town square was already in his party’s hands.

All the goblins’ loot had been piled up around the hostages. The villagers themselves, dozens of them gathered in the center of the square, were still asleep, but as far as Goblin Slayer could see, no one was hurt. Having confirmed this, he nodded once.

Next, he turned his attention to the goblin corpses.

“Six of ’em here for you.” Dwarf Shaman had dragged the bodies to one spot and was now wiping his hands with a look of disgust. “Aagh! Gods above, but goblins do stink.”

“Are you sure?”

“Sure they stink or sure they’re dead? The answer’s yes, in any case. All the ones my spell hit anyway. How’re you doing, Scaly?”

“Mm.” Lizard Priest, who was still watching vigilantly on the other side of the square, nodded gravely. “I took three apart with my claws and fangs. Mistress ranger shot three with her bow. Six between us. No mistake, I believe.”

“I see. Nineteen, then,” Goblin Slayer muttered, reaching into the mound of corpses. He was checking whether any of the dead goblins had been carrying a sword.

He found one and extracted it, checking the blade, and when he found it was acceptable, he put it in his sheath. At last he seemed to calm down.

“Uh, hey, Orcbolg. Where’s the girl?” High Elf Archer’s complaint from earlier seemed to be forgotten. When she said the girl, she could mean only one person.

“I sent her to bring the child.”

“Do you think she’ll be all right?”

“Yes.” Goblin Slayer nodded. “I don’t think there’ll be any issues. That’s been my experience, at least.”

He looked once more at the villagers. He located the person who looked both the oldest and the best dressed and strode over to him.

“Are you the village chief?”

“Er, well, yes. Who are all of you…?” He looked at Goblin Slayer, suspicion multiplying the wrinkles in an already elderly face.

Goblin Slayer answered by showing his level tag.

“We’re adventurers.”

“Adventurers… And you’re Silver-ranked…”

The village headman blinked several times, then understanding entered his eyes. “Could you be the Goblin Slayer…?”

“Yes,” Goblin Slayer murmured, evoking a shout from the headman.

“Oh-ho! I am so, so glad you came! Thank you! Thank you…!”

The grateful old man took Goblin Slayer’s hand in his own two hands, which looked like gnarled tree branches. His hands and arms, once built up by farmwork, no longer had their former girth or strength. Yet Goblin Slayer could certainly feel the handshake as the man moved his hand up and down.

“There are some things I want to ask you.”

“Certainly. Anything.”

“First of all, do you have an herbalist or healer in your village? A cleric of some kind? One capable of miracles.”

“Ahem… We rely on visiting priests when we need a cleric. As for an herbalist, well, we have one…” The headman looked apologetic. Perhaps he thought the adventurers would ask for some payment, or at least support. “But she’s only a young woman. She became our medicine woman just recently, when her parents died in an epidemic. She isn’t…”

“I understand,” Goblin Slayer said immediately, as if this were perfectly natural. “We’ll help care for the wounded. My party—” He paused for a second. “—has two clerics.”

“Wha…?”

“I’m sorry to say I can’t spare any potions.” He tapped his item pouch. The little bottles inside rattled. “If what you say about your medicine woman is true, I doubt she’ll be of much help. We can only offer you some miracles and first aid.”

When Goblin Slayer asked, “Does this upset you?” the headman shook his head vigorously. The suspicion in his eyes had turned first to amazement and then to respect.

Wandering minstrels told wondrous tales of an adventurer who rushed to the aid of any village that was attacked by goblins; in their songs, this hero was well-spoken and beautiful. Had there been even a shred of truth in what they sang?

“Ha-ha-ha! I see now why you prevented me from creating a Dragontooth Warrior,” Lizard Priest said, approaching the two of them.

“Frontier people are superstitious,” Goblin Slayer said. “Especially about bones.”

“How thoughtful of you.”

“I was the same way, once.”

Lizard Priest rolled his eyes in his head by way of acknowledgment. “True. Naga or no, many might believe that only a necromancer could control a skeleton warrior.” Then he said, “We must classify the injured by the severity of their wounds,” and with a wave of his tail, he was off.

The lizardmen had always been fighters. As a race, they often made for superior medics.

“I’m surprised,” High Elf Archer muttered, watching the exchange from a distance. She had her bow in her hands at last and was scanning the area, but she was trying hard to keep Goblin Slayer in the corner of her vision.

He was seated among the villagers now, tending to them with items he took out of his bag. He was bandaging wounds with herbs that would stop bleeding and neutralize poison, applying pressure to the injuries. Even here, he seemed somehow different.

“I’m sorry, thank you so much.” Beside him, a woman in robes was bowing her head—the medicine woman they’d spoken of, perhaps.

High Elf Archer’s pointy ears twitched, and a catlike smile came over her face. “It turns out Orcbolg really can hold a conversation, when he wants to.”

Beside her, Dwarf Shaman stroked his beard and nodded. “Well, Beard-cutter is the most well-known of all of us.” Unlike his elf companion, who was on guard duty, with the fighting over, the dwarf had next to nothing to do.

Not that he was unhelpful. He didn’t know first aid, but he walked around with many little items that served as catalysts for his magic. One of them was fire wine, which he described as “good for drinking and good for healing.” It was a powerful spirit, which also made it an excellent disinfectant. He had given a jar of it to the medicine woman, who had accepted it with profuse thanks, to the shaman’s distinct embarrassment. The way of the dwarves was to remember debts and gratitude as well as grudges while not sweating the little things.

“Goblin Slayer, the most beloved adventurer on the frontier… Isn’t that the song that made you recruit him?”

“Well, yeah, sure. But it turns out the song and the reality don’t have much in common…” High Elf Archer puffed out her cheeks in displeasure as she thought back on the ballad she had heard.

It said he was made of the sternest stuff, that he was taciturn and loyal. A man without greed, who wouldn’t spurn even the smallest reward. When goblins appeared, he would go to even the most remote and rustic places to meet them, and his sword would slay them all. He was held up almost as if he were a saint or a Platinum rank.

“But when you really think about it… He does get along really well with that girl at the Guild.”

“They say those who don’t know the true situation are quick to jealousy. It’s the same everywhere.” Dwarf Shaman glanced up at the elf with a teasing smile. “So you really shouldn’t envy her just because she puts to shame that anvil you call a chest.”

He could practically hear the anger seize High Elf Archer’s face.

“After all, unlike a certain cleric girl, elves take a century or two to develop!”

“Oooh, I can’t believe you said that! You great wine barrel of a—!”

“Ho-ho-ho-ho! Among dwarves, a nice figure is a requirement for a proper man!”

And they were off and arguing, the same as usual—but it wasn’t a sign that they had let their guards down. Dwarf Shaman hadn’t taken his hand off his bag of catalysts, and High Elf Archer’s ears were still moving, listening. She heard the two approaching sets of footsteps.

One was a child, the other the familiar footfalls of Priestess. High Elf Archer knew all this full well.

“Big Siiiiiis!”

“Oh…!”

A glow came over the face of the medicine woman, who had been moving among the wounded. The little girl came running to her, and the medicine woman caught her with both hands, hugging her to her chest. They both burst into tears, paying no heed to the eyes around them.

Goblin Slayer watched this in silence, until at length, he looked away. He could no longer look because Priestess, who had gone to get the child, had a bright smile on her face for some reason.

“What is it?” he asked.

She squinted a little at the blunt question and replied innocently, “Heh-heh. Oh, nothing… I was just thinking you looked…happy.”

“Is that so?”

“Yes, it is.”

“Is that so………?”

Goblin Slayer checked to make sure his helmet was still in good condition. There was no smile on that visor.

“Well, fine. See to the treatment of the villagers. And the funerals.”

“The funerals…” Priestess put a thin, pale finger to her lips, thinking for just a second. “The only funerary rites I know are those of the Earth Mother. Do you think it’ll be all right?”

“I doubt they’ll care. So long as it’s the ritual of a god of order.”

“Okay. Leave it to me,” Priestess responded promptly, then she looked around and moved off, holding her sounding staff. “Sorry I’m late!”

“Ah, you’ve come.” Lizard Priest, tending to an injury with his rough, scaled hand, turned his head on his long neck to look at her.

“Yes,” she said with a firm nod and began pulling bandages and ointments out of her pack. “I still have one miracle left, so if there are any serious injuries, I can use Minor Heal on them…”

“In that case, I shall leave this patient to you. He seems to have been severely beaten, and all my artifice has done little.”

“All right!”

When she had lived at the Temple, Priestess’s job had been the treatment of wounded adventurers. As she rolled up her sleeves and began bustling among the injured, she projected more authority than her years would suggest.

Goblin Slayer followed her with his eyes, mulling over a question in his mind.

Surely this can’t be the end, but…?

“Orcbolg!”

The entire party looked up at the sharp and clear warning from High Elf Archer.

It must have been watching from the shadow of a barrel. Now, it had jumped out from the shadows and was dashing down the road—a single goblin trying to make his escape.

He ran like a frightened hare; nearly slipping and stumbling, growing ever smaller in the distance.

But only for a moment.

“Pixies, pixies, hurry, quickly! No treats for you—I just need tricksies!”

Dwarf Shaman intoned the spell Bind, and a rope wrapped itself around the fleeing goblin like a snake. It caught him around the legs and sent him crashing to the ground.

This was all the opening High Elf Archer needed. “You thought we’d let you get away?!” In a motion dramatic enough for a painting, she drew the great bow off her back and jumped. From barrel, to wall, and then into space, she took leap after leap, aiming at her target.

“So it was twenty…!”

That was when Goblin Slayer drew an arrow from his own quiver. “Don’t kill him! We want him to take the poison home and spread it!”

High Elf Archer reached up and grabbed the arrow out of the sky in an acrobatic movement. An instant later, the arrow whistled off, looking like a beam of light. The elf landed on the ground at the same moment as, in the distance, the goblin tumbled. How she had loaded, drawn, and fired the bow in that time, no one knew. It was truly a skill so advanced that it looked like magic.

“Happy now?” She returned her oaken bow to her back as she landed.

“Yes. But…” Goblin Slayer was almost muttering to himself, his gaze fixed on the goblin in the distance. He had pulled the shaft out of his shoulder and cut the rope around his legs and was running off again. He was heading north—toward the snowy mountain from where an an icy wind blew.

“…this is not over yet.”

That was something the whole party knew well.

The goblins had gathered the villagers in the square because they had wanted to go looting; they gathered their spoils in the square, as well. And yet, they hadn’t touched the women. That meant they had been planning to take them back to their nest. The twenty goblins who attacked the village were only an advance unit. There were more of them, though there was no knowing whether they would launch a fresh attack or simply withdraw.

Goblin Slayer completed his calculations and issued his conclusion without reluctance:

“As soon as our spells have been replenished, we go on the attack.”

He knelt before the village headman seated on the ground, then looked him in the eye. The headman’s face was drawn at the thought of another battle, but Goblin Slayer only said, “I want to request preparations for a night attack, as well as a place to rest for a night. You don’t mind?”

“Wh-what? N-not at all! If we can do anything to help you, just let me know…”

“Then tell me about the party of adventurers that came before us. And do you have any trackers in this village?”

“Y-yes, so we do. Just one… He’s young, but he’s here.”

“I need to know the geography of the mountain. I want a map, even a simple one.”

The headman was nodding eagerly, but then he seemed to think of something, and an obsequious smile came over his face. “Oh, but… When it comes to a reward, we can’t…”

“The goblins are more important,” Goblin Slayer said flatly. Ignoring the stunned headman, he stared at the mountains to the north. Somewhere behind the veil of clouds, the sun had already sunk behind the peaks, and the fierce wind carried hints of night.

“As soon as everything’s ready, we will go and slay them.”

§

Thankfully, all things considered, damage to the village was minimal. Of course there were those who had been injured or killed fighting against the goblins. Some houses had been torched, others smashed—naturally. But the adventurers had arrived before either the loot or the captured women were carried off to the nest. So perhaps it was for the better. Or at least, Priestess thought so.

And yet… And yet, she couldn’t quite embrace this as the best possible outcome, she thought, as she looked out over the village’s cemetery.

Once they had finished tending to the wounded, she, the medicine girl, and Lizard Priest had to deal with the burials.

“O Earth Mother, abounding in mercy, please, by your revered hand, guide the souls of those who have left this world.”

Sounding staff in hand, she murmured her prayer, making the holy sign as each body was put into the ground and covered with earth.

This was the obvious thing to do, even if there weren’t a risk of the corpses becoming undead if they were left exposed. If the living failed to say farewell to the dead, how could they go on with their lives? These burials were less necessary for the dead than they were for the living.

So long as the dead had been among those who had words, their souls would be called to the god each of them believed in. Thus, the world would keep turning.

“I doubt an attack will come tonight, although I can’t be certain,” Goblin Slayer said, after he had left the villagers to complete the burials. “You must be exhausted. Rest.”

As usual, his speech brooked no argument—and yet, Priestess at least understood that this was his way of showing concern. Even if she still thought him a rather hopeless person.

No matter how often she chided him, he never learned. Indeed, if she had refused, he wouldn’t have listened. So she figured it was best just to go along with him, despite the flash of annoyance.

“Ahh… Phew.”

That was why she was currently relaxing in a warm bath. She exhaled, the breath seeming to come from everywhere in her body, each muscle relaxing.

She was in a hot spring. The snowy mountain nearby had, it seemed, once been a volcano, and the fire sprites still heated the water through the earth (or something like that).

The hot spring sat beneath a roof on stilts, surrounded by rocks as steam drifted gently upward. The familiar stone icon of the Deity of the Basin presided over the wash water. But it depicted two faces, perhaps because this was a mixed bath open to both men and women. For that reason, Priestess had carefully wrapped herself in a towel.

As she settled into the murky water, however, her body, so long stiffened against the cold, seemed to melt. She couldn’t stop the relaxed groan that escaped her.

“Mmmmm…”

High Elf Archer, it seemed, was a different matter. Her slim body, not a scrap of covering on it, looked as gossamer as any faerie. Yet she kept shuffling around the edge of the bath, looking like a frightened rabbit. She would clench her fists, determined, then hesitantly dip a toe in the water before jumping back.

“Oooh… Ohh… Are you sure about this?” She looked like a child who didn’t want a bath—in fact, she looked much like the younger clerics Priestess knew, and it brought a smile to her face.

“I’m telling you, it’s fine. It’s just a spring with some hot water.”

“It’s a place where the sprites of water and earth and fire and snow all come together. That really doesn’t bother you…?”

“Should it? I think it feels wonderful…”

“Hmmm…”

High Elf Archer’s gaze flitted between herself and Priestess, and her ears twitched uncertainly. After a time, she suddenly bit her lip, and—

“Y-yaaaah!”

“Yikes!”

—all but flung herself into the pool, causing a great splash that crashed down on Priestess.

“Pff! Pff!” High Elf Archer, who had gone under up to the top of her head, surfaced looking like a bedraggled cat, spitting and squeezing water out of her hair. Finally, she looked at Priestess with an expression of surprise and then let out a breath.

“…Huh. This water’s warm. It’s kind of…nice.”

“Gosh! Isn’t that what I’ve been trying to tell you? …And you’re not supposed to jump in.”

“Sorry about that. I was just too scared to do it any other way.”

“…Hee-hee.”

“…Ha-ha-ha!”

They looked at each other, both of them soaked from head to toe, and broke into cheerful laughter.

No matter how high a rank an adventurer achieves, the anxiety of battle never goes away. High Elf Archer might have been Silver-ranked, but she was still young and inexperienced; and Priestess, all the more so. They may have been from different races, but emotionally they were about the same age.

They sat beside each other, looking up at the sky. The stars were blacked out by thick, leaden clouds, and only a shadow of the two moons could be seen.

He had said once—when had it been?—that goblins came from the green moon.

The girls’ clothing was piled neatly beside the bath, along with the weapons and tools they had used in the earlier battle. Goblin Slayer had warned them to be wary of a surprise attack while bathing.

Maybe he wears that armor and that helmet even in the bath…

The image was just too funny and set the girls giggling again.

“I wish everyone else would’ve joined us,” Priestess said.

“Oh, you know. ‘Mud is more amenable to a lizard.’ Seriously, who washes themselves in mud?” I just don’t get lizard folk. Priestess’s smile widened at the elf’s impersonation. “And the dwarf was all, ‘Wine is the way to revive your spirits!’ As for Orcbolg…”

“…Guard duty. Of course.” Priestess blinked, her eyelashes moistened by the steam, and hugged her knees. “I’m a little worried, though. He won’t take a rest…”

“Yeah, well, he’s got all that energy. Got to kill the goblins, he says.”

“Doesn’t that…seem strange to you?”

Sure does was a conclusion both of them could agree on. It was easy to picture him, keeping watch on the snowy plain and muttering, “Goblins, goblins.”

“If we left him to his own devices, he’d spend his whole life like that,” High Elf Archer said.

“I think…you’re right.” Priestess nodded deeply in response.

It was really true. Goblin Slayer had changed considerably in the year since she’d met him. As had she. But still…

“Well, it’s thanks to falling in with him that I get to visit the North like this, so I guess I don’t mind,” the elf said. She splashed restlessly at the water as if buying time to think. The motion stirred up the steam. Priestess glanced at her.

“Um… You said you left home because you wanted to see what was beyond the forest, right?”

“Uh-huh.” High Elf Archer stretched out her arms and legs, relaxing. Priestess shifted how she was sitting. “We say, ‘You’re alive until you die,’ but if all you ever know is the woods, what’s the point?”

“I can’t even imagine living for thousands of years.”

“It’s not such a big deal. It’s like being a huge, old tree. You’re just…there.”

It wasn’t a bad thing in and of itself. High Elf Archer traced a circle in the air with her pointer finger. Priestess naturally followed the movement with her eyes. Even the smallest of elf gestures was polished and refined.

“So,” Priestess said, sliding down in the water to hide the embarrassment of how taken she was with the movement. “You left because…you got bored? I mean, I hear that happens a lot…”

“You’re half-right.” She paused. “It’s true, I felt there was something I had to do.”

She related how she would hunt overpopulated animals and return them to the earth, pick fruit where there was too much, to wet her throat, and generally keep her eyes fixed on the cycles of nature.

It’s enough to make your head spin. There’s always work to do. And the forest never stops growing. But you know what?

Here, she winked and smiled mischievously. “One time, I saw a leaf being carried along by a river. And I wondered, where does it go? And then I couldn’t stop wondering.” She laughed.

She had rushed back to her home and got her bow, and then she was off among the trees, quick as a deer, chasing that leaf. When she next looked around, she realized she had left the woods. She jumped from rock to rock across the stream bed, following the leaf.

“And…what did you find?”

“Nothing interesting, I can tell you that,” she said, squinting her eyes like a contented cat. “A dike. One the humans had built. It was the first time I had ever seen one—I thought it was pretty interesting.” The leaf, carried along by the stream, had gotten caught in the dike.

It was hardly as though she had received some revelation. High Elf Archer smiled faintly. Then she opened her lips ever so slightly and whistled. She was humming a song in her clear voice.

What is it that waits at the end of the river?

What is it that blooms where the birds do fly?

If the womb of the wind is beyond the horizon

Then where does the rainbow come down from the sky?

Far must we walk to discover the answers

But fair are the things on the way that we find

Priestess blinked, eliciting a satisfied “Heh!” from High Elf Archer.

It was said there was no race so elegant as the elves.

High Elf Archer glanced at Priestess’s chest and produced a sigh.

“You still get to keep developing… Lucky you.”

“Er… Wha?!” Priestess could only produce a series of strange noises, and her face went completely red. “Wh-what are you talking about?! And all of a sudden like that!”

“We’re talking about time. The passage of time. That’s what the song was about, and that’s what my comment was about.”

She snickered. It sounded like a bell ringing in her throat. As she laughed, she reached out and ran a hand through Priestess’s soaked hair.

“I mean… Me, I still have some time, but…”

“Just some?” Priestess looked down, not resisting the hand in her hair.

Yeah, High Elf Archer nodded. “Humans… They get old and die after just a hundred years or so, right?”

“Uh-huh…”

“I wonder why everyone can’t live for a long time. Maybe it’s something that would make sense to me if I were human.”

“…If you were born as a human, you’d just wish you were as beautiful as an elf,” Priestess murmured. She didn’t regret who she was, but there was always the fascination of if, the unanswered wish.

That day, for example. She had fought side by side with Goblin Slayer; he had watched her back. What if she could have fought more? What if she were more accomplished in miracles or spells? Would she have been more help to him?

She had once promised that if he was in trouble, she would help him. Had she done that today? At this rate…

If we left him to his own devices, he’d spend his whole life like that.

She felt as though a reckoning was coming, one that couldn’t be avoided.

“…”

“And if you’d been born an elf, I bet you’d wish you were human.” High Elf Archer punctuated her remark by giving Priestess’s head a little hug before letting her go. Priestess thought she could just catch the scent of the forest filling her nose.

Surely she was imagining it. This place was supposed to be home only to earth and water and fire.

But… What if she wasn’t imagining it?

The elves must be connected to the forest even when they leave it behind…

“You’re probably right,” Priestess said and let out a breath. She felt as though something deep in her heart, something stagnant and stiff, had begun to give way.

“Should we think about getting out?” she asked. “We don’t have much time to just hang around.”

“True.” High Elf Archer stood abruptly. “The world just refuses to play nice, doesn’t it?”

§

“The situation doesn’t look good,” Goblin Slayer said. He was standing in front of a crackling fire in the village tavern. The second floor was an inn, which was typical of such places.

The warmth of the fire filled the log building, shadows from the trophies on the wall dancing in the firelight. The adventurers, back from their respective relaxations, sat around a large table with cups filled to the brim with mead.

The medicine woman and her sister, along with nearly everyone else in the village, had urged their rescuers to lodge in their respective homes, but Goblin Slayer had refused.

“We will all pay for a place at the inn. Divided, we can’t respond quickly to whatever may happen.”

Priestess was slightly mystified by the rush of relief she felt when he said that.

Now the villagers surrounded the adventurers at some remove. They were half-expectant and half-curious. Some also eyed the party’s women with undue interest. Priestess shifted uncomfortably under their leering gazes.

I guess it’s a small blessing there’s no one who looks like any real trouble…

“Do you think…they don’t want us here?” she asked, looking at the food on the table.

Boiled potatoes, regular potatoes, potatoes, potatoes… Everything on offer was potatoes. Priestess, of course, by no means expected to live in luxury. She was used to humble fare. And yes, it was winter; there was snow on the ground and it would be necessary to conserve provisions. But still—nothing but potatoes?

“Nah,” Dwarf Shaman said with a shake of his head. “From what I heard, the last adventurers to come through bought up all the supplies.”

“Everything?”

“Said they needed it to slay goblins, if you can believe that.” Dwarf Shaman rested his chin on his hands.

“Ha-haa! I suppose…” Lizard Priest’s tail swished along the ground as if to say that it wasn’t theirs to judge. “It’s said one must draw out goblins before one can slay them. A little bit of coercion, you see. Perhaps they really did need those supplies…?”

Hmm. Priestess put a finger to her lips in thought, her hair flowing in a wave as she tilted her head quizzically. It was clear who to go to with a question like this.

“Was it necessary?”

“It depends on the time, and the place, and the circumstances,” their goblin-slaying specialist replied flatly. “Now and again, you’ll encounter wandering tribes with no nest. Pursuit can take considerable time.”

“But time’s something we don’t have, right?” High Elf Archer said, lapping happily at the mead. Her cheeks were already a faint red; the bath might have had something to do with it, but it was chiefly the alcohol. “We don’t know what’s in the nest, and we don’t know how many of them there are. Plus, there’s the possibility that the other adventurers are still alive.”

“We’re only lucky that the villagers weren’t taken away. Who knows if we could have helped them in time?”

Goblin Slayer nodded, then unrolled a sheet of lambskin paper on the table. “We can’t wait until the sickness from the arrows becomes fatal, but they may be somewhat weakened by now.” On the paper was a simple map of the route from the village to the mountain; he had asked the local hunter to draw it. Some scribbled notes appeared to have been added by Goblin Slayer himself. “According to the trapper, this is the most likely place for a goblin nest.”

“Yeah, but…” High Elf Archer ran a finger over the map, measuring the distance between the village and the cave. “If no villagers were kidnapped, why didn’t we go in right away?”

“I believe I know what the previous adventurers were planning.” The room’s collective gaze fixed on Goblin Slayer. He took a fried potato and put it in his mouth. His helmet moved slightly, emanating the sounds of chewing and swallowing. “The medicine woman told me that the party bought wood along with their other supplies.”

“Wood?” Dwarf Shaman asked. “But they could just—no, wait, don’t tell me, I’ll get it.” He took a swig of mead, ignoring the look the elf gave him as he brushed several droplets off his beard.

The wise old dwarf grunted to himself, and a moment later he snapped his fingers and said, “Ah! I know now! It’s not firewood, so it isn’t about filling the nest with smoke. They were preparing for something. And they brought food. Meaning…”

“Yes,” Goblin Slayer said as if it were the most natural thing in the world. “They meant to starve them out.”

There was an audible crack from the fire. For a time, no one talked. Lizard Priest picked up a poker and jabbed listlessly at the firewood. There was another noise as the wood split in two, sparks flying.

“But then, the foe is many and they were few,” he said.

“That tactic has its uses,” Goblin Slayer said dispassionately. “But not when you are attempting to exterminate a large number of enemies on their own land.”

Priestess pictured the scene, her body going stiff. The terror of facing down starving goblins for days on end.

I don’t think I could bear it.

Then Priestess thought of the villagers. How they had asked for adventurers to stop the goblins stealing food from them, and this party had decided on a tactic that used the whole town’s provisions.

“We cannot prepare even one sword, one potion, or one meal’s worth of food on our own.” Glug. Goblin Slayer took a drink of his mead without even having to remove his helmet. “And adventurers without supplies will be dead by nightfall.”

“Orcbolg, maybe you could think about something else for once.”

“I’m trying.”

Glug, glug. More mead.

His four companions watched this with the faintest of smiles on their faces. They knew this party would never have been formed if this man were not exactly the way he was.

“And milord Goblin Slayer,” said Lizard Priest, who was used to the role of military adviser by now. “What strategy do you have in mind?”

“None to speak of.” He sounded uncharacteristically relaxed.

They had no idea how the nest was laid out or how many enemies were there. Not knowing if the other adventurers were still alive, they couldn’t simply destroy the nest outright. And if the goblins had attacked once, they would surely come a second and a third time.

Thus, there was only one possible strategy.

“We blitz them.”





The adventurers left the village at dawn. They had wanted to reach the nest as soon as possible, but night belonged to the goblins. True, the “white darkness” reigned both day and night here, but there was no reason to hand an advantage to their opponents. There was no objection to leaving town at the moment when the scales between safety and danger were most evenly balanced.

No objections as such anyway…

“Ooooh… It’s so c-c-c-cold…!” High Elf Archer whined, her long ears trembling as they walked among the snowdrifts. She was accustomed to life on her feet, but her first time on a snowy mountain was still something of a surprise.

A rope tied all the members of the party together. Scaling the snowy peak would not be easy. The fluffy white snow carpeting the ground was deep and cold, and if anyone was unlucky, their foot might find a place where there was nothing but loosely packed snow. There were spots with sharp fallen rocks, where a careless stumble could cost one’s life.

“Erm… Hrgh. Hmm. This is quite…”

“Are you okay…?”

“Oh… But of course…”

Lizard Priest, who came from the South, became even slower as he grew colder. He nodded at Priestess, who was looking at him with worry, and curled up his tail. Dwarf Shaman grabbed his hand.

“Hang in there a bit longer. I’m using Tail Wind to keep the blizzard off us. It could be worse.”

“Hmm. And I’m grateful.” Lizard Priest nodded. “Milord Goblin Slayer, how does it look ahead?”

“No problems.”

“That’s reassuring.”

Goblin Slayer was walking just a bit ahead of his four companions. He looked down the ridge of the mountain, comparing their position to the map in his hand.

“We’re almost there.”

Be that as it may, the scene before them was an uninspiring one. A dark hole marred the white landscape of the mountain. Waste was piled to one side of the entrance. It was certainly the sort of place that monsters would call home.

They were all thankful for Dwarf Shaman’s Tail Wind spell, which enlisted the help of wind sprites to hold the blizzard at bay. Still—

“We need to get warm,” the dwarf said. “Heeey, Beard-cutter! All right if I start a fire?”

“Please.”

“On it.”

With skill befitting a dwarf, he pulled out some dry branches and struck a flint.

“Where did you find those?” Priestess asked.

“Under the snow, and then a little farther down. You’d do well to remember that.”

They sheltered in a small cave they dug out of the snow so the goblins wouldn’t see their fire. The sky, heavy with clouds, was still slightly dark; the sun was weak and far away.

“Sunset is near. When our bodies have loosened up, we’ll go in.” Goblin Slayer loosened the straps on his armor and set down his bag.

Priestess looked at him in surprise; she had never known him to remove his armor like this before. “Are you sure it’s okay to be doing that?”

“If I don’t spend at least a few minutes this way, my body will never relax.”

He took off his gauntlets, squeezing his rough but untanned hands mechanically.

“You should rub your arms and legs,” he said. “If they’re poisoned by ice sprites, they may rot and fall off.”

“Eep!” High Elf Archer yelped. She knew as much about sprites as any of them, and maybe that made the thought even worse for her. With a frown, she began to work her fingers along her limbs.

“Your feet, too. Don’t forget.”

“Er, right!” Priestess took off her boots and socks and began rubbing her pale, slim toes. Her socks surprised her; they were soaked through and quite heavy. Perhaps it was a mixture of sweat and snowmelt.

I should’ve brought a second pair…

“How are you doing?” Goblin Slayer asked, looking at Lizard Priest. The monk’s scaly face was as difficult to read as Goblin Slayer’s but for an altogether different reason. Still, it was clear enough that he was practically frozen stiff from the cold.

Lizard Priest picked a bit of ice off his scales. “M-mm. Well, we’ve arrived anyway. Who knew there were such chilly places in the world?”

“There are others even colder than this.”

“Incredible!”

He could well believe the rumors that his forebears had been annihilated by a deep freeze.

Quietly snickering at the lizard, Dwarf Shaman reached nimbly into his bag and pulled out a jar of fire wine and cups for the whole party. He began to pour.

“Here, here’s some wine, drink up. It’ll warm your innards.”

“Wonderful. Mm, you know just the thing, master spell caster.”

“Oh, stop it, you’re embarrassing me. Here, some for you.”

“Th-thank you,” said Priestess.

“Thanks.” High Elf Archer.

“I appreciate it.” Goblin Slayer.

They each began to sip at their drinks. They were only seeking a bit of warmth; it would have been counterproductive to get drunk.

Without warning and for no perceptible reason, High Elf Archer brought the conversation around to Lizard Priest. “Hey, didn’t you tell us that your goal was to raise your rank and become a dragon?”

The lizard’s huge body was curled up as close to the fire as he could get, and the bag of provisions was in his hand. Perhaps he was hungry, or perhaps he just wanted a little taste of the cheese he was now taking out.

Lizard Priest didn’t attempt to hide what he was doing but nodded importantly.

“Indeed; even so.”

“A dragon who loves cheese, huh?” She took another sip from the cup in her hands and giggled.

“Better for the world than a wyrm that wants treasure or sacrifices of maidens,” Dwarf Shaman said.

“At least he wouldn’t have to worry about anyone trying to slay him. Can I have a piece of that?”

“Indeed you may.”

They were within spitting distance of a goblin nest, still freezing despite their fire, but High Elf Archer was feeling a little bit warmer and in good spirits. She used an obsidian dagger to slice off a piece of the cheese Lizard Priest offered her, then tossed it into her mouth.

The food from that farm was delicious, as ever. Her ears twitched happily.

“Tell me the truth. Do girls really taste that good to dragons? Or is it some sort of ritual or something?”

“A fine question. Perhaps when I become a dragon, I shall understand.”

“Are you… I mean, you don’t have any doubts that you’ll be able to become a dragon?” Priestess asked, sipping hesitantly at her wine. A small sigh escaped her lips. “I mean…breathing fire and flying through the air… Maybe those are things you could do with miracles?”

“Heh-heh-heh! That’s how the old folk describe dragons, all right!” Dwarf Shaman had already drained one cup and was pouring himself a second. “But you can’t believe most of what old folks say anyway.”

“But in my hometown resided a great and terrible dragon that had turned to a skeleton. And if apes can become humans, surely lizards…”

Priestess smiled slightly at this grave murmur from Lizard Priest. Each person had their own faith.

“Oh, that’s right!” High Elf Archer said suddenly, snapping her long fingers. “When you become a dragon, you’ll be immortal, right? I’ll come visit you!”

“Oh-ho.”

“I mean, we’re talking at least a thousand years, right? You’ll get super-bored. You’ll go crazy without any friends to help you pass the time.”

She said seriously that she estimated at least 60 percent of the world’s rampaging dragons were just looking for something to do.

Lizard Priest nodded in acknowledgment. Then he tried to imagine what it would be like when he became a dragon.

“A dragon who speaks of the adventures of Goblin Slayer. One visited by a high elf.”

“And…one that likes cheese,” High Elf Archer put in.

This caused Lizard Priest to roll his eyes happily. “That sounds quite congenial.”

“Right?”

“But enough of that. A thousand years will pass in due course, and we must attend to what is coming now.” Lizard Priest turned to look at Goblin Slayer. “Milord Goblin Slayer, how shall we attack them?”

He had been listening to the conversation silently. Now he said, “Good question,” and immediately lapsed back into thought. Then he said, “I think we should do as we usually do. Warrior in front, then ranger, warrior-monk, cleric, and spell caster.”

“By the book,” Lizard Priest said.

“That tunnel looks wide enough,” said Dwarf Shaman, who had peeked around the snowdrift for a look at the entrance. “Perhaps two by three will do?”

Goblins had good night vision. The entrance to the nest yawned silent and dark. There didn’t seem to be any guards. Was it a trap? A careless oversight? Or…

“Feh. My wine doesn’t taste so good anymore,” Dwarf Shaman said with a cluck of his tongue. He must have noticed that the waste at the entrance was more than just trash.

The body of an adventurer lay among the refuse. The corpse had been thrown away as if it were no more important than a broken-up fence. Her equipment had been stripped off; it was clear she had been much defiled, and her exposed remains gnawed on by beasts.

Cruelest of all, the adventurer appeared to be an elf woman. Appeared—well, she must have struggled, and the violence seemed to have continued after her death. Her ears had been cut down to the size of a human’s, the tips stuck in her mouth. The goblins’ twisted games knew no bounds.

High Elf Archer glanced at Dwarf Shaman. “Hmm? Something wrong?”

“…Naw. Nothing,” he said bluntly. “But take my advice, Long-Ears, and don’t go peeping around too much.”

“I would never. Most of the time.”

“Hey,” Goblin Slayer grunted, and asked softly of Dwarf Shaman, “…was Gold-hair there?”

The dwarf shook his head slowly. He stroked his beard, took another look, then shook it more firmly. “Doesn’t seem so, as far as I see.”

“Then we may still have time,” Lizard Priest said, and the other two men nodded.

Priestess shuddered, perhaps intuiting something of what their conversation portended. Goblin Slayer tapped her on the shoulder and said, “Let’s go.” Then he glanced at the girl’s pale, bare feet. “Put on your socks and boots.”

§

The shadow of the torch flame danced eerily in the wind. But the angle at which the tunnel had been dug meant that even just a step inside, one was sheltered from the snow and the wind; one could almost be warm. If it weren’t for the smell of meat and excrement that drifted from within, the place could almost be cozy.

“Hmm. The path descends at a rather steep angle,” Lizard Priest said, his tail swishing with interest.

“Yeah, but it goes right back up again over there,” High Elf Archer said.

“Mmm.”

It looked as if the goblins had dug down into the ground immediately upon beginning their nest and then come back up. The rather severe angles didn’t seem natural; most likely, they had been made by goblin hands.

“Hmm. Quite a clever barrier against rain and snow,” Dwarf Shaman said, showing his fine knowledge of construction. He glanced back over his shoulder at the entrance. “Any precipitation that blows in gets caught here and doesn’t go any farther into the tunnels.”

“Goblins make things like that?” Priestess said, blinking with perplexity or, perhaps, surprise. She well remembered what she was often told: that goblins were stupid, but they weren’t fools. In other words, just because they didn’t have much knowledge didn’t mean they didn’t think. But this…

“I don’t know.” Goblin Slayer’s answer was dispassionate, almost mechanical. He drew the sword at his hip and used it to stir the pool of waste at the bottom of the depression. He clicked his tongue. “We can’t say anything yet. All I can tell you is, try not to step in the water.”

“Is there something in there?” Priestess asked.

“It’s a trap. There are stakes at the bottom.”

A pit trap, in other words. Rather than burying it, the goblins had hidden it at the bottom of a waste pool.

High Elf Archer, testing the depth of the pool with one of her bud-tipped arrows, frowned. “Ugh. That’s vile.”

“I need you to listen for enemies.”

“I know, I know. Leave it to me, I told you.” She jumped nimbly over the pool, but then winked mischievously and laughed. “I can’t stand getting so dirty too many times.”

A fragrant sachet hung around High Elf Archer’s neck to help keep away smells. She twitched her long ears with pride, but Goblin Slayer shook his head and said bluntly, “Getting dirty isn’t the point.”

“Ah-ha-ha-ha-ha… Right, but, well, when you get that messy, it’s a pain to clean up… Right?”

Priestess heard the hollow note in the elf’s laugh. A similar pouch hung next to the status tag around her own neck. She may have gotten used to rubbing blood and guts all over herself, but it was never something she enjoyed.

Come to think of it, the pile of corpses next to the tunnel entrance was much the same. She had plenty of experience with goblins now, had seen this many times and fancied herself accustomed to it—but still. She needed more than a joke or a chuckle…

“Hey.” High Elf Archer, up ahead, glanced at her and nodded gently. She was the same way. Elves had exceptional sense perception. Seeing the flutter of the archer’s ears, Priestess nodded back.

“Let’s…do what we can.”

“Right.”

After going down and then up two or three more slopes, the party finally arrived at the cave’s main tunnel. The torch had nearly burned down, and Goblin Slayer replaced it with another from his pack.

“Hold this.”

“Oh, yes, sir!”

He gave the smaller torch to Priestess, while he held the new one, which burned brightly.

The humans were the only members of this party, indeed, the only ones in this cave, who lacked decent night vision. In the light from the torch, Goblin Slayer examined the earthen walls intently.

They seemed to have been dug with some crude tool. They were rough but sturdy—a textbook example of a goblin nest.

The problem was elsewhere.

“I don’t see any sort of totems.”

“Does that mean there are no shamans?”

“I don’t know.” He shook his head. “I don’t know, but I don’t like it.”

“Mmm… But wouldn’t it be easier for us if they don’t have spell casters?” High Elf Archer asked.

“It had begun to bother me as well,” Lizard Priest said, opening his huge jaws. “The attack on the village, the skill with which they dispatched the previous adventurers. It would be hard to imagine that there are no brains behind this operation.”

“Do you suppose it’s another dark elf or an ogre?” Priestess asked.

“Or maybe…a demon?” High Elf Archer whispered with a petrified expression. The word echoed through the halls of the cavern, making their hair stand on end.

The adventurers looked at one another, and then Dwarf Shaman, stroking his beard, let out a breath. “Ahh, stoppit already. No sense getting all uptight over hypotheticals.” He reached up (because he was very short) and slapped Goblin Slayer on the back. “This isn’t exactly what we call ‘striking a famous sword with a hammer.’ But, Beard-cutter. We ought to focus on what we can do now.”

“Yes,” Goblin Slayer said after a moment. He raised the torch and took another look at the wall, then nodded. “Were you alluding to a dwarven proverb?”

“I was,” Dwarf Shaman said with a pleased sniff.

“I see.” As Goblin Slayer set off walking with his usual bold stride, murmurs could be heard. “There’s no need to further forge a famous sword.” And then, “Hmm. Not bad.”

The layout of the cave didn’t seem too complex, and they followed the path for a while. There was no sign of goblins, only a pervasive stench of rot.

“I think I’m gonna be sick,” High Elf Archer muttered, pulling her collar up over her mouth. Nobody else said it aloud, but most of the party seemed to sympathize with her—Goblin Slayer excepted.

Eventually they came to a T-shaped intersection. High Elf Archer immediately crouched down, inspecting the floor carefully for footprints.

“Lots of prints heading to the right,” she reported, clapping her hands to get the dust off them. She couldn’t always read man-made buildings, but in natural settings like this cave, her eyes were reliable. That suggested that to the right were sleeping quarters, with an armory or warehouse to the left. Or perhaps…

“Last time, we started with the toilet,” Dwarf Shaman said.

“Correct,” Goblin Slayer said. “It would be inconvenient to miss someone simply because he was using the bathroom.”

“Same plan this time?”

“Mm,” Goblin Slayer grunted.

Should they do the same thing they had done before? Was it safe to use the same strategy each time? What was the likelihood that the enemy would predict what they were going to do?

Imagine. Think. If a human’s actual armaments were his first weapon, knowledge and planning were his second.

If he were a goblin, what would he do?

“We’ll hit the right first.” Goblin Slayer made his determination without compunction. There was no debate.

High Elf Archer nocked an arrow into her great bow, while Lizard Priest prepared a fang blade. Dwarf Shaman had his bag of catalysts in hand, and Priestess gripped her sounding staff firmly.

They moved quickly through the tunnels, arriving at a large, hollowed-out living area. There before them was a horde of goblins, carrying shovels and pickaxes as if preparing for a surprise attack…

§

“O Earth Mother, abounding in mercy, grant your sacred light to we who are lost in darkness!”

With these words, Priestess seized the initiative. She did this through no special ability—just a roll of the dice. But the way she intoned the Holy Light miracle without hesitation was a sign of how much she had grown. She held up her staff, the end of which was host to the sacred miracle. A brilliant light filled the cavern.

“GORARAB?!”

“ORRRG?!”

The goblins, struck by the holy light, pressed their hands to their eyes and cried out. She counted ten—no, fifteen?

“Seventeen. No hobs, no spell casters. Archers present. Let’s go!”

For the adventurers, who had the light at their backs, the illumination was no problem at all.

“First blood is mine!” No sooner had Goblin Slayer issued his order than a bud-tipped arrow began to fly. High Elf Archer had drawn back the spider-silk string of her bow elegantly, releasing the three arrows she carried in a single motion.

The cavern may have been dark and confined, but that was no hindrance to an elf’s aim. Her skill was so advanced that it was hardly distinguishable from magic. Three goblins collapsed where they stood: fourteen left. A hail of stones began to assail the remaining creatures.

“Come out, you gnomes, it’s time to work, now don’t you dare your duty shirk—a bit of dust may cause no shock, but a thousand make a lovely rock!”

Dwarf Shaman flung some sand into space, turning it into rocks that rained down on the enemy.

“ORGAAA?!”

“GROOROB?!”

The goblins howled and fell back. The Stone Blast spell assailed them indiscriminately, breaking bones and tearing flesh.

At this point, of course, spells that harmed the enemy and those that aided allies were both of use. It was Dwarf Shaman himself who had settled on Stone Blast, an offensive technique. Spells that struck an entire area were best while one held the initiative, before engagement with the enemy.

Ten goblins left. Screeching and weeping their vile tears, the monsters surged forward.

“Here we go! You’re up, Beard-cutter! Scaly!”

“Hrrrooahhh!”

“Good.”

One great roar and one curt reply: the two members of the party’s vanguard stood blocking the entrance to the room. It was only logical that they not enter; when fighting a large number of opponents, it was wise to choose a choke point and defend it.

The enemy, which had outnumbered them nearly four to one, was reduced to half its strength. And only two or three goblins could stand abreast in the tunnel. Against the two warriors, and in light of the terrain, the fight was nearly even. It only went to show how crucial it was to take the initiative in combat.

After all, there would always be more goblins than there were adventurers. The fate of adventurers who sought to face goblins without acknowledging that basic fact was a cruel one.

“GORROB!”

“Eeyahhhh!”

The goblins were still half-blind from the flash of light; their attacks were hardly worth worrying about. Lizard Priest struck out with claws and tail, dealing one goblin a mighty blow and rending another to pieces. Eight left.

Lizardmen respected animality—for it was a bestial nature combined with keen intellect that defined the nagas. Violent and brave, war cries mingling with prayers, Lizard Priest threw himself at the surviving goblins.

“Hmph.” Just beside him, Goblin Slayer stabbed the creatures in their vital places—quietly, dutifully, precisely.

Throat, heart, head. It didn’t matter. Humanoid creatures tended to have a great many weak points. Goblin Slayer personally preferred the throat. A stab there might not result in an instantaneous kill, but it would render the target helpless. He kicked aside a choking goblin and hurled his sword at another one farther away.

“ORAGAGA?!”

“Ten, eleven.”

His target collapsed, pierced through the throat. Even in the dark, his aim was exact.

Six left. Goblin Slayer shoved a club belonging to one of the dead goblins with his foot, kicking it up into his hand. He caught an ax blow from the goblin beside him with his shield, then aimed a strike of the club at the creature’s stomach.

“ORARAO?!” Something disgusting poured from the goblin’s open mouth. Goblin Slayer struck again. This made two more since his last count.

After dealing a vicious blow to the creature’s skull, Goblin Slayer nonchalantly swept the vomit from his shield.

“Thirteen. The enemy is going to recover soon.”

“Right!”

Four left. Hardly an excuse to take it easy, of course.

Despite the nervousness evident on her face, Priestess held up her sounding staff and invoked another of the soul-erasing miracles.

“O Earth Mother, abounding in mercy, grant your sacred light to we who are lost in darkness!”

The Earth Mother answered the prayer of her faithful disciple with another miracle. Blinding light filled the room once more, banishing the darkness of the cavern.

The goblins, however, were no fools. They were certainly not intellectuals, but when it came to cruelty and malice, they had no equals. And when this total lack of principles was joined to violence, the result was inevitable.

The staff the girl held up had shined. Now she was raising it again. That meant it would shine again.

One of the goblins, putting these most basic facts together, ducked his head. Unfortunately, he was one of the archers. As his three companions were murdered, he kept his head down, waiting for his chance, bow and arrow at the ready.

“Hh—Haagh!”

The shout seemed to be one of shock. Someone tumbled: it was High Elf Archer. The goblin’s arrow had lanced between the two frontline guards to strike her. A critical hit indeed.

“What is this, now!” Lizard Priest exclaimed.

“Hrrgh…” A crude but sinister arrow stuck cruelly out of High Elf Archer’s leg.

Goblin Slayer glanced back, then tossed his club before running over to the elf.

“ORAAG?!”

Woosh. The club spun once in the air and then connected firmly with a goblin’s head, provoking a scream. It wasn’t enough to kill the creature, though. As he ran, Goblin Slayer picked up a dagger from the ground, covering the final few steps in one great leap.

“GOAORR…?!”

The goblin grabbed his arrow and spun, trying to get away, but he was too late. The dagger plunged into his heart, twisted once, and it was over.

“Seventeen…”

That was all of them.

Looking around at the pile of corpses, Goblin Slayer picked up a nearby sword and put it in his scabbard.

“Hey—hey, you all right, Long-Ears?!”

“Hrr—r—yeah. I’m—I’m fine. I’m sorry. I failed.”

“I’ll tend to you right away,” Priestess said. “Is it poisoned?”

“Here,” Lizard Priest’s gravelly voice said. “First, we must remove the arrow.”

High Elf Archer’s face was pale, but she was trying to act brave; she kept her hands on the wound as she murmured, “Okay.”

Normally, Goblin Slayer might have gone straight over to his comrade. But this was still enemy territory. They needed to be alert for any possible ambush.

From what Goblin Slayer could see, the wound was not fatal—and anyway, there was something he wanted to check. He went over to the corpse of the last goblin archer he had killed and gave it a nonchalant kick.

“Hrm.”

The body rolled, exposing the shoulder. There, he saw a scar, from an arrow wound that had since healed. He remembered this goblin.

“…Wha?!”

“What’s wrong?”

At that moment, Goblin Slayer heard voices of surprise coming from behind him and turned around. He strode over to where High Elf Archer was cowering. Priestess looked up at him from beside her.

“G-Goblin Slayer, sir… Look at this.”

With a shaking hand stained with High Elf Archer’s blood, she held up the shaft of an arrow. Yes—just the shaft, no arrowhead.

It had been carved from a branch, crudely enough to suggest a goblin’s work; it even had some ugly little feathers stuck on the end. The head, however, had not been well secured. Or… Perhaps that had been done deliberately. Maybe the arrowhead was intended to break off and remain inside High Elf Archer’s body.

He had been careless.

No—the contemplation, and the remorse, would have to wait.

Immediately, Goblin Slayer knelt by High Elf Archer’s side.

“Does it hurt?”

“I-I-I’m just fine, r-really… Orcbolg, you w-worry too much…”

It looked like it hurt just to move. Blood was flowing from High Elf Archer’s leg, and she was groaning.

“Keep pressure on the wound. It will help stem the blood. Although it isn’t much.”

“R-right, I’ll… I’ll do that.” No doubt she was trying to sound strong, but her voice was much softer than usual.





Goblin Slayer switched to asking Priestess questions.

“Any kind of poison?”

“For the moment, I don’t think so. But…” As she spoke, Priestess looked with concern at High Elf Archer’s injury. Even with the elf squeezing as hard as she could, blood was leaking out between her fingers. “With the arrowhead still lodged in there, there wouldn’t be any point in closing the wound up with a healing miracle…”

A cleric’s miracles might come from the gods, but their effects were limited by physical reality. Using Minor Heal while a foreign object remained in the body was a difficult situation.

Goblin Slayer glanced at Lizard Priest, but he shook his head, too.

“Refresh is capable only of enhancing the body’s native healing abilities.”

That made the conclusion simple. Dwarf Shaman reached into his pouch as he spoke. “Can’t just leave it there, can we? Beard-cutter, lend me a hand, will you?”

“Sure.” He and the dwarf looked at each other and quickly got to work. Priestess, who had some idea of what they were going to do, looked rather distraught; High Elf Archer, who didn’t, merely seemed uneasy.

Goblin Slayer drew a dagger—his own, not one he had stolen from a goblin—and checked the blade.

“I’ll do it. Give me fire.”

“Sure thing. Dancing flame, salamander’s fame. Grant us a share of the very same.” Dwarf Shaman removed a flint from among his catalysts, striking it as he spoke. A little ghost-flame sprung up in midair, shining on Goblin Slayer’s dagger.

Goblin Slayer heated the blade carefully and then snuffed the flame out with a quick motion. Almost at the same time, he pulled a cloth from his own bag and tossed it at High Elf Archer.

“Hold that in your mouth.”

“Wh-what are you planning?”

“I’m going to dig out the arrowhead.”

High Elf Archer’s long ears stood straight up.

“I—I don’t want you to do that! After we get home, we can—!”

Still sitting on her behind, she scrambled backward. Dwarf Shaman let out a sigh.

“No whining, now, Long-Ears. Beard-cutter has the right of it. You want that leg to rot and fall off?”

From beside them, Lizard Priest spoke coolly and with the conviction of a rock falling from the sky. “There would certainly be no reattaching it then.”

“Ooh… Ohhh…”

“Come on, everyone, you’re scaring her.” Priestess, unable to sit by any longer, scolded the men of the party—but she made no effort to stop what they were doing.

She herself had an arrow pulled out of her by force once. She knew the fear, and the pain—and just how much worse it could get if they left it alone.

“…At least, try to do it in the least painful way possible.”

“What else would I do?” Goblin Slayer was waiting for the red-hot blade to cool to the right temperature. A traveling doctor had taught him that doing this would get rid of any poison on the blade.

“Show me the wound.”

“Errgh… Ohh… You really won’t make it hurt, will you…?” Very slowly, her face completely bloodless, High Elf Archer moved her hand.

Goblin Slayer didn’t respond but inspected the injury, from which blood was still dripping.

“Wine.”

“Right ’ere.” Dwarf Shaman took a mouthful of fire wine and spat it out, as if he were casting Stupor. Tears leaped to High Elf Archer’s eyes as the alcoholic spirits burned in the wound.

“Hrr…rrgh…”

“Bite down on the cloth. So you don’t bite your tongue.”

“Just… Just asking again, but… You won’t make it hurt, will you…?”

“I can’t promise anything,” Goblin Slayer said with a shake of his head. “But I’ll try.”

High Elf Archer, appearing resigned, bit down on the cloth and squeezed her eyes shut. Priestess clasped her hand. And then Goblin Slayer plunged the dagger into the elf’s thigh, widening the wound, digging deeper.

“Hrrrrrgh—Gah! Gaggghhh…!”

High Elf Archer’s lithe body flopped like a fish that had washed up on the shore. Lizard Priest pressed down on her shoulders to hold her steady, and Priestess continued to hold her hand. Goblin Slayer didn’t pause in his work; his hand was cruel but sure.

The removal of the arrowhead took only a matter of seconds, although High Elf Archer might have sworn that hours had passed.

“Done.”

“Hooo…hooo…” She let out long breaths of relief.

Lizard Priest placed a scaled hand on High Elf Archer’s thigh and recited, “Gorgosaurus, beautiful though wounded, may I partake in the healing in your body!” He was granted a gift: Refresh. The power of the fearsome nagas made the archer’s wound better before their very eyes. Flesh joined itself, and skin built itself up, the wound seeming to boil away. A true miracle.

“Can you move?” he asked.

“Y-yeah,” High Elf Archer said unsteadily, tears still at the edges of her eyes. She moved her leg back and forth, checking that it worked. Her ears drooped pitifully. “H-human first aid is awfully violent. I can still feel it.”

“A-are you okay?” Priestess asked, offering her shoulder to support High Elf Archer as she stood up.

“I think so…”

“Can you shoot your bow?” Goblin Slayer asked.

“Of course I can,” the elf replied, perhaps a little more hotly than necessary.

She wasn’t bragging, exactly. But even if she could still shoot, her mobility was impaired. At least for the remainder of the day.

“We ought to make a tactical retreat—” Goblin Slayer shook his head. “—but we can’t do that yet.”

“I am not confident in the number of our spells and miracles remaining,” Lizard Priest announced calmly.

Even so, the helmet turned slowly from side to side. “There are still more of them deeper in. We have to investigate.” Goblin Slayer checked his armor, helmet, shield, and weapon. Satisfied, he turned to his companions. “I can remain by myself if you prefer.”

The wounded High Elf Archer was the first to respond. “Don’t try to be funny. We’re coming with you. Right?”

“Indeed! We certainly are,” Priestess said with an energetic nod.

“Mm,” Goblin Slayer grunted. Lizard Priest laughed and put a hand on his shoulder.

“I suppose that means all of us are going, then.”

“Pfah! Long-Ears, never thinking of how tired the rest of us are,” Dwarf Shaman said with a smile and an exaggerated shrug.

High Elf Archer fixed him with a glare. “Hey, Orcbolg’s the one who wants to—”

And they were off and running.

Goblin Slayer, ignoring the customary ruckus of their argument, took another look around the living area. Although outmatched, the goblins had shown no sign of trying to run away.

So there was a goblin who had copied his little trick. One who had received first aid for his arrow wound. And one who commanded him.

“I don’t like it,” he muttered.

He didn’t like it at all.

§

“Hmph.”

Goblin Slayer gave the rotted old door a kick, bringing it crashing down. At almost the same moment, the adventurers piled into the room, taking up positions, with Priestess in the center of their formation, holding a torch.

“Hrm…”

They had expected a warehouse or an armory or, perhaps, a toilet. But the room the light shone on was none of those.

Much like the living area from earlier, this was another large room dug out of the earth. There were several mounds of dirt that might have passed for chairs. Farther into the room was an oblong stone that might have been brought from elsewhere.

It was unmistakably an altar.

This was a chapel—so was this cave a temple? If so, this altar would be where they offered their sacrifices…

“Oh…!” Priestess was the first to notice, as was often the case. She rushed over. The memory of a trap they had encountered in the sewers flashed through her mind, but that was no reason to hesitate. She would be vigilant—but she would not refrain from helping.

A woman lay atop the cold stone as if she had been simply tossed there; she wore not a scrap of clothing. Her exposed body was dirty, and the way her eyelids were squeezed shut spoke to her exhaustion. Her matted hair was a gold the color of honey.

“She’s breathing…!” Priestess said happily, gently cradling the woman.

Her ample chest rose and fell gently: the proof of life.

“Quest accomplished, huh?” High Elf Archer muttered, obviously believing no such thing.

There was never any sense of satisfaction or closure in slaying goblins. She pursed her lips and looked around the chapel. It was a primitive place of worship. To a high elf like her, it didn’t seem like it would be possible to sense the presence of the gods in a place like this.

“…I wonder if a priest of the Evil Sect was here.”

“Or perhaps these are vestiges of some ancient ruin,” Lizard Priest said, looking around. The elf could hear him scraping away at the dust as he examined the place. “Though I cannot quite imagine what god could be worshiped in such a vulgar place…”

“Wait just a bloody moment,” Dwarf Shaman said, running his finger along the wall. “This earth is fresh. This was dug out recently.”

“Goblins?” Goblin Slayer asked.

“Probably,” Dwarf Shaman nodded.

Were goblins fallen rheas? Or elves or dwarves? Or did they come from the green moon? No one knew. But as creatures that made their homes underground, they had estimable digging skills. No matter how remote the place, goblins could dig a hole and start living in it before anyone knew what was happening.

They could pop out and surprise a group of adventurers as easily as they could eat breakfast. One didn’t have to be Goblin Slayer to know this. On her first adventure, Priestess had—

“Um… Look here…!”

At the distressed exclamation from Priestess, he looked once more at the captive adventurer. Priestess was holding up the woman’s hair, not afraid to get her own hands dirty. She was pointing to the nape of the woman’s neck.

High Elf Archer couldn’t hold back a mutter of “That’s awful,” and it was hard to blame her. The unconscious woman’s neck bore a brand, which stood out painfully. The ugly red-and-black impression besmirched her otherwise beautiful skin.

“Hrm…”

Goblin Slayer picked up the metal brand, which lay on the floor nearby. It looked like a stray horseshoe or some such thing had been worked into a complicated shape.

“Is that what they used?” Lizard Priest asked.

“So it appears.”

It seemed to be a sort of circle, in the middle of which was something that looked like an eye. Goblin Slayer took a torch and examined the brand carefully, fixing it in his memory. Was it the mark of a noble tribe or clan? There remained many mysteries about goblins.

“However… It doesn’t appear to be a goblin totem.”

Goblins had little notion of creating things themselves. They would simply steal what they needed; that was enough for them. This brand, though—even if it was constructed from a combination of found items—represented an act of creation.

“I think it’s…the green moon,” a shaking voice said. It was Priestess, gently stroking the woman’s neck. “It’s the sign of a god. The deity of external knowledge…the God of Wisdom.”

—Many gods gathered around this board, to watch over it. They included, of course, the God of Knowledge, who ruled over the knowing of things and found many faithful among scholars and officials. The light of the God of Knowledge was said to shine among all who ventured into the unknown, seeking the truth and the ways of the world.

Yes: what the God of Knowledge granted was not knowledge itself but guideposts, a path leading to the truth. For adversity itself was an important kind of knowledge.

The God of Wisdom, who was the deity of the knowledge of things outside, dealt with something subtly different. The God of Wisdom did not lead supplicants to knowledge but gave wisdom to all who asked. What this would do to the world, the board, was probably of no interest to the deity.

Consider, for example, a young man who, confronted with the niggling unhappinesses of daily life, mutters, “Maybe the world will just end…” Normally, such words would be mere silliness, an innocent expression of dissatisfaction. But when the eye of the God of Wisdom falls upon such a person—what then?

In an instant, some terrible way of ending the world enters the young man’s mind, and he begins to take action. More than a few believe in this god, thanks to unaccountable bursts of insight. But…

“Geez. Now my head hurts almost as much as my leg,” High Elf Archer said, frowning as if she indeed had a headache. “I’ll keep watch. You guys go on.”

“Hey,” Dwarf Shaman said with a touch of annoyance. “It’s all well and good you’re keeping guard, but you can at least listen to what we’re saying.”

“Yeah, sure…” She didn’t sound very enthusiastic. She thumbed the string of her bow, an arrow held loosely at the ready. She kept shifting her legs restlessly; perhaps the pain was bothering her. Her ears flicked a little as she listened carefully.

Goblin Slayer glanced in her direction but then looked once again at the brand.

“The green moon, you said?”

“Yes, sir. I learned just a little bit about it during my time at the Temple.” Priestess didn’t sound like she quite believed it herself. Her time as an apprentice seemed so far away already.

“You mean the one the goblins come from?” Goblin Slayer murmured, picking up the metal brand. “If so, then there’s no doubt that our enemies are goblins.”

He spoke without a hint of hesitation. “One of those goblins showed signs of having been healed.”

But who would go so far as to use a miracle to help a goblin?

“An agent of chaos just overflowing with mercy and compassion?” Lizard Priest scoffed. “I doubt it.”

“Then it must have been a goblin, right?” Priestess said. “But… How could they…?” She blinked, as if she didn’t want to believe it.

The god who gave knowledge from outside was a mercurial one; it would not have been a great surprise if the deity had spoken to a goblin.

It wouldn’t have been strange, yet a desperate doubt remained in Priestess’s heart. Even so, if the goblins were able to complete a ritual… That would be far worse than occasionally hearing the voice of God.

“Are you sure it isn’t some high-ranked evil priest, a dark elf or something?” she asked.

“What? I don’t think so,” a high, clear voice said in response to Priestess’s suggestion.

Dwarf Shaman sighed again and stroked his beard with more than a little annoyance. “You can keep watch or you can chat. Pick one.”

“You’re the one who told me to listen to you guys. If I’m listening, I have the right to contribute, don’t I?” High Elf Archer chuckled quietly.

“Mm,” Lizard Priest said, nodding in agreement. “And mistress ranger. What would you like to contribute?”

“I mean—” She spun her pointer finger in a circle. “If you’ve got a bunch of goblins, and you only use them to do some looting… That doesn’t make you much smarter than a goblin, does it?”

“Well hell, Long-Ears, maybe a bunch of bandits found religion and thought they were supposed to worship the goblins!”

“You’re just upset that you can’t believe in your own explanation anymore.”

“Hrm, well.”

“Heh.” Lizard Priest gave a sort of snort, crossed his arms, and then began counting off on his fingers. “It thinks like a goblin, controls goblins, heals goblins, attacks people, and is a follower of evil.”

Priestess put a finger to her lips, thinking through the possibilities. “A goblin priest? A warrior-priest?”

Nothing quite seemed to fit. What were they facing here? A goblin of some kind? But what kind?

At that moment, an idea came into Priestess’s head, as suddenly as if it was a gift from heaven.

It was an outrageous, impossible idea. But…

Things began to make sense if they were dealing with someone who wielded an army against nonbelievers.

“No… It can’t be. That’s impossible.”

“…”

She hugged her own shoulders, shook her head, refusing to believe it.

Beside her, she could hear the brand creaking in Goblin Slayer’s fist.

It wasn’t possible. It was ridiculous. But in fact, nothing was impossible.

There was only one answer. Goblin Slayer acknowledged the truth of their enemy clearly.

“A goblin paladin…”





“That’s their little den over there.”

The cold was cutting, but it did nothing to dim the young woman’s beauty. She looked like the daughter of nobility, like someone who would have been more at home in an elegant ballroom than under the gray skies of the northern mountains.

Her wavy, honey-colored hair was tied in two tails, and her facial features had a prideful cast. The size of her bust was obvious despite the chest armor she wore, her waist so narrow that she had no need for a corset.

The rapier that hung at her hip was of striking construction; the way it demanded admiration gave much the same impression as its master.

At the girl’s neck hung a brand-new Porcelain-level tag, catching the sun that shined off the snow.

She was an adventurer, and she and her four companions had spent several days scrambling up the side of this snowy mountain. Now an ugly little hole lay open before them. One look at the disgusting mountain of waste beside the entrance made it clear that this was a nest.

And what did the nest belong to? With these newly minted heroes here to do battle, what else could it be?

Goblins.

Noble Fencer’s heart lusted for battle at the very thought of them.

Now, here, she had no family and no riches, no power or authority. Only her own abilities and her friends would help her complete this quest. A true adventure.

For their first deed, they would get rid of the goblins attacking the village in the North. They would do it more quickly than anyone had ever seen.

“All right! Is everybody ready?” She put her slim hands to her hips in a proud gesture that emphasized her chest, then pointed at the nest with her sword. “Let’s starve those goblins out!”

That had been weeks ago.

It was good that they had stopped up the goblins’ tunnels by erecting defensive barriers around the exits. And they hadn’t been wrong to set up a tent, build a fire for warmth, and prepare an ambush.

“The goblins are attacking the village because they’re low on supplies,” Noble Fencer had said, full of confidence. “They’re foolish little creatures. A few days without food, and they’ll have no choice but to make a run for it.”

And indeed, that was what happened. They fell on one group of goblins trying to break through the defensive barriers and killed them. Some days later, a group of starving monsters emerged, and they, too, were slaughtered. It was safe to say that everything was going as planned. They would complete the quest with hardly any danger and a minimum of effort.

But that was as much a dream as the idea that these untested new adventurers might suddenly become Platinum-ranked. If it were as easy as they imagined, goblin slaying could hardly be called an adventure.

This was the north country, a frozen place—there was even an ice cap nearby—beyond the territory of those who had words. A person’s breath could turn to ice as soon as it left their mouth, burning the skin, and frozen eyebrows made noise each time one blinked. Equipment became heavy with the chill, stamina draining away day by day with next to no relief.

There were two other women in the five-person party including Noble Fencer, though the men of course kept their distance. They ate to try to distract themselves and keep up their strength. It was all they could do.

But the load was heavy, since it included their equipment, the barriers, and the cold-weather gear. Individually, each of them carried only a handful of provisions. One of their members knew the ways of a trapper, but there was no guarantee it would be possible to obtain food for five people.

Arrows, too, were limited. They could try to retrieve the ones they had used, but…

First and foremost, though, they ran out of water.

Their group made the mistake of eating the ice and snow, giving themselves diarrhea and further taxing their endurance.

They weren’t stupid; they knew they had to melt the stuff over a fire, even if it was troublesome.

Meaning, of course, that next they ran out of fuel.

They had scant food, no water, and no way to keep warm. It spelled the ignominious end of Noble Fencer’s seemingly foolproof battle plan.

Yet, it would be ridiculous to give up by this point. They were only dealing with goblins—the weakest of monsters. Perfectly suited to beginners, to a first adventure. To run back home without even having fought the creatures would be humiliating. They would forever be branded the adventurers who had fled from goblins…

That being the case, someone had to go down the mountain, get supplies in town, and return.

The adventurers looked at one another, huddled under their cramped tent, and all focused on one thing. Specifically, Noble Fencer, who was shaking from the cold, using her silver sword like a staff to support herself, yet levelly returning everyone’s gaze.

Nobody wants to blame themselves when things go wrong.

“You go,” their rhea scout said, sharply enough to pierce a heart. Even though he had been the first to agree when she had suggested the starvation tactics, saying he thought it sounded interesting. “Right now, I’m the only one doing any work around here. Go get that! Catch us some dinner!” I just can’t stand it, he muttered.

“…He’s right,” their wizard said, nodding somberly from underneath a heavy cloak. “You know what? I was against this idea from the start. I haven’t even had a chance to use my spells.”

“Yeah, I agree.” It was the half-elf warrior next, stifling a yawn as she spoke. “I’m getting pretty tired of this.”

If Noble Fencer recalled correctly, neither of them had thought starving the goblins out was an excellent idea at first. When she explained that this would be the safest method, however, they had both come around.

What was more, Noble Fencer thought that she and Half-Elf Warrior had grown closer over the past several days of marching. She turned her gaze on the warrior, feeling betrayed, and gave a dismissive little sniff.

“But then there’d be no point to all our suffering,” the half-elf added. “And what do you think, Pint-sized?”

“Eh, I don’t much mind whoever goes.” The dwarf monk played with a symbol of the God of Knowledge, apparently trying to answer in as few words as possible. “But dwarves and rheas have such short legs. And half-elves are so slight. I think a human is our best bet here.” He looked at Noble Fencer with a sly glint in his eyes, which were almost lost in his black facial hair.

Warriors were more suited to going it alone than spell casters. He might as well have asked her to go outright.

“…Very well. I’ll do it,” Noble Fencer, who had listened in silence until that moment, replied curtly. “It’s obviously the most logical choice.”

Yes, that was it. She would go because it was logical. Not because her plan had failed. Or so she repeated to herself as she worked her way down the long mountain road.

Leaning on her heirloom sword as a staff, she removed her breastplate and stashed it on her back, no longer able to endure the weight and the cold. She bit her lip, embarrassed that her adventurer’s equipment had winded up as nothing more than more luggage.

On top of that was the welcome waiting for her back at the village.

“Ah! Master adventurer, you’ve returned! You’ve had success?”

“Well, uh…”

“Were any among your number injured?”

“Not yet… I mean, we haven’t…fought them yet…”

“Gracious…”

“But I wondered…could you…could you share a bit of food with us, please?”

The answer was no.

One could imagine how the headman and the villagers felt. The adventurers they had summoned via the quest network had been away for weeks and yet had accomplished nothing! And now they wanted more food, more fuel, more water. If the village had the spare resources to supply five heavily armored young people, would they have needed to call for adventurers in the first place? They barely had enough for the winter themselves. Trying to support an adventuring party on top of that would be too much.

It could only be called a stroke of good luck that Noble Fencer was able to wheedle a few trifles out of them.

“…”

The cruel irony was that these additional supplies only made her return journey that much slower and more difficult. With every step she took through the snow, regret filled her heart like the ice that sloshed in her boots.

Should they have made more preparations beforehand? Invited more adventurers to be part of their party? Or maybe they should have made a tactical retreat instead of pushing ahead with the starvation idea…?

“No! Absolutely not! No one is running from goblins!”

She let her emotions do the talking, but there was no one to talk back.

By now she was enclosed in night, a night that further blackened the “white darkness” of the whipping snow. She had already been exhausted when she began this march with her heavy load, and everything about it was a cruelty to her.

“We won’t give in…to goblins…”

She breathed on her numb hands, trying desperately to set up her tent. Just having something, anything, between her and the snow and the wind would make such a difference…

“It’s cold… So cold…”

The icy night air was merciless. Hugging herself and trembling, Noble Fencer fumbled with some firewood.

“Tonitrus,” she murmured, incanting the Lightning spell. Small bolts of electricity crackled from her fingertips and set the logs alight.

Noble Fencer was a rare frontline fighter who could use lightning magic, which she had learned because it was a family tradition. And what would be the harm of a little lightning here? She could use it once or twice each day; it made sense to put it to work starting a fire so she could get some warmth. But even that was a luxury, for it used up some of the meager firewood the villagers had given her.

“………”

She spoke no further but hugged her knees, trying to curl into a ball to help her escape from the sound of the howling wind and snow.

Until a few days ago, she had had friends.

Now, she was all alone.

Her companions were a few hours’ climb away. They were waiting for her. Probably.

But Noble Fencer simply didn’t have the strength to reach them.

I’m so tired…

That was everything, all she could think.

She loosened her belt and the straps of her armor. It was something she had once heard you should do. The warmth of the fire began to seep into her body, and her spirit eased.

She had imagined dispatching the goblins readily, easily. In the blink of an eye, she would have risen to Gold or even Platinum. She would make her own name, not rely on her parents’ power. But how difficult that was turning out to be!

I guess…maybe I should have expected it.

Things like fame and fortune did not come to a person overnight. They accumulated over decades, centuries. Had she believed that she, alone and unaided, would be able to put forth all at once an effort worthy of such accomplishments?

I’d better apologize.

Did she mean to her friends or to her family? She wasn’t sure, but the humility she felt in her heart was real as Noble Fencer closed her eyes.

She began to drift off, consciousness growing farther away. With such fatigue in her bones, how could she want anything more than rest?

That was why she didn’t realize immediately what she was hearing.

Splat. The sound of something moist slapping down.

Somehow the edge of the tent had come up—had the wind caught it?—and something had landed next to the fire.

Noble Fencer sat up from where she had lain down and looked at the thing sleepily, questioningly. “I wonder what…this is…”

It was an ear.

Not a human one, but the ear of a half-elf, cruelly severed halfway down.

“Ee—eeyikes!”

Noble Fencer fell backward, landing on her behind. Still shouting, she scrambled back.

At that moment, there came a horrible laughter; it seemed to surround the tent.

It was the moment after that that something from outside grabbed the tent and pulled it down.

“Ahh—oh! No! What’s this?! Why are you—?!”

Noble Fencer writhed under the fallen tent, half-mad. The bonfire spread to the tent, sending up copious amounts of smoke, causing her eyes to water and inducing a coughing fit.

When the fighter at last worked her way out from her entrapment, she was hardly recognizable as what she had once been. Her neat golden hair was in disarray, her eyes and nose messy with tears and snot, and there was ash on her face.

“Ee-eek! G-goblins…?!”

She shouted and recoiled at the sight of the dirty little creatures, backing away from the sound of their hideous laughter. Noble Fencer was completely surrounded by goblins in the dark, snow-whipped night. They had crude clubs and stone weapons and wore little more than pelts.

Yet, it was not the appearance of the goblins that so terrified Noble Fencer. It was what they held in their hands: the familiar heads of a rhea, a dwarf, and a human.

Farther away, the half-elf was being dragged limply by the hair through the snow. She left a red streak behind her like a brush across a canvas.

“Oh… Please…”

No, no. Noble Fencer shook her head like a spoiled child, the movement sending waves through her hair.

Had they waited until she was away to attack?

Had the others decided to assault the cavern while Noble Fencer wasn’t there, leading to this grisly end?

Noble Fencer reached for her sword with a hand that wouldn’t stop shaking, tried to draw it from its scabbard—

“Wh-why? Why can’t I g-get it out…?!”

She had committed a crucial error. What had she thought would happen? Her sword had been soaked by snow, then she had left it by the fireside—and now it was exposed to the cold again. The snow had melted onto the hilt and scabbard. What else would it do in this situation but freeze once more?

Dozens of goblins closed in on every side of the weeping fighter. The girl, however, pulled her lips tight. Maybe she couldn’t draw her sword, but she began to weave a spell, her tongue heavy with the cold.

“Tonitrus…oriens…!”

“GRORRA!!”

“Hrr—ghh?!”

Of course, the goblins were not kind enough to let her finish. She was hit in the head by a ruthless blow from a stone; it brought Noble Fencer to her knees.

Goblin “sympathy” served only one purpose: to mock their pathetic, weeping, terrified prey.

Her shapely nose had been squashed, the dripping blood dyeing the snowy field.

“GROOOOUR!!”

“N-no! Stop—stop it, please! Ah! H-hrggh! No, please—!”

She cried as they grabbed her hair, screamed as they took her sword.

The last thing she saw was her own feet flailing in the air. Noble Fencer was buried by more goblins than she could count on two hands.

So who was it who had been starved out here? Was this what they got for challenging the goblins on their home turf? Or for failing to prepare well enough to see out their own strategy?

Whatever the case, we surely need not dwell on what befell her next.

That was the end of those adventurers.

§

Noble Fencer’s eyes opened to the crackling sound of flying sparks. She felt a faint warmth, but the ache in her neck—a burning sensation—let her know that this was reality.

What had happened? What had been done to her? A series of memories flashed through her mind.

“…”

Noble Fencer silently pushed the blanket aside and sat up. She appeared to be in a bed.

When she looked around, she saw she was in a log building. A smell prickled her nose—wine? It had been one more bit of bad luck that even being stuffed in a pile of waste hadn’t dampened her sense of smell.

She was on the second floor of an inn. In one of the guest rooms, she thought. If she wasn’t simply hallucinating.

At the same time, she could see a human figure crouching in one dark corner of the room, which was illuminated only by the fire.

The figure wore a cheap-looking helmet and grimy armor. The sword he carried was a strange length, and a small circular shield was propped up against the wall. He looked singularly unimpressive—except for the silver tag around his neck.

Noble Fencer’s voice was done shaking. “Goblins,” she said. She spoke in a whisper, more to herself than to anyone else.

“Yes.” The man responded just the same, his voice quiet and his words blunt. “Goblins.”

“…I see,” she said, and then lay back down in bed. She closed her eyes, looking into the darkness on the backs of her eyelids, and then she opened them ever so slightly. “What about the others?” she asked after a second.

“All dead,” came the dispassionate reply. It was almost merciful in its cold directness, giving her only the facts.

“I… I see.”

Noble Fencer thought for a moment. She marveled at how hardly a ripple passed through her heart. She had expected to cry, but her spirit was strikingly quiet.

“Thank you for helping me.” A pause. “What I mean is…is it over?”

“No.” The floorboards creaked as the man stood up. He fastened the shield to his left arm, checked the condition of his helmet, then approached her with a bold, nonchalant stride. “There are some things I’d like to ask you.”

“…”

“Just tell me what you can.”

“…”

“You don’t mind?”

“…”

Perhaps taking Noble Fencer’s silence for agreement, the strange man continued detachedly: How many goblins had she encountered? What was the layout of the nest? What types of goblins were there? Where had she encountered them? What direction?

She answered without emotion.

I don’t know. I don’t know. They all looked the same. Near the cave. The north.

The man only grunted, “Hmm,” adding nothing further.

Snap. Crackle. The moments of intermittent speech were connected by the muttering of the fire in the hearth.

The man rose and took a poker in his hand, jabbing it listlessly into the fire. Finally, he spoke, still facing the hearth and just as quietly as before.

“What did you do?”

“…Tried to starve them out,” Noble Fencer said, something tugging at the edges of her mouth. It was only a slight gesture, so small that no one but she might have noticed it. But she thought she had smiled. “I was sure it would work.”

“I see.” She nodded at this dispassionate reply.

Block off the exits to the cave, wait until the goblins started to starve, then finish them off. She and her friends could do it together, nice and clean. Get some experience, raise their ranks. And then… And then…

“I was so sure…”

“I see,” he repeated and nodded. He stirred the fire again and then put aside the poker. There was a rattling of iron as he stood. The floor creaked. “Yes, I understand how that could happen.”

Noble Fencer looked up at him vacantly. The helmet prevented her from seeing his face. It occurred to her that these were the first comforting words he had said to her.

Perhaps the man had already lost interest in Noble Fencer, because he strode for the doorway. Before he got there, she called out to him.

“Hey, wait!”

“What?”

Something was coming to her, a dim and ambiguous image from somewhere on the far side of memory.

That grimy armor. That cheap helmet. That strange sword and round shield. Someone stubborn and strange, with a Silver status tag around his neck. Someone who killed goblins. All just a dim memory.

But it reminded her of certain lines from a song she had heard somewhere. It brought back memories of long, long ago, when she and her friends were laughing together in town.

An adventurer known as the kindest man on the frontier.

“Are you…Goblin Slayer?”

“……”

He didn’t respond immediately; there was a moment of silence.

Then, without turning around, he said, “Yes. Some call me that.”

His voice, as ever, gave no hint of his emotions, and with that, he left the room.

There was the sound of the door closing. The poker on the ground was the only sign he had been there.

Noble Fencer stared up at the ceiling. Someone had cleaned her skin and clothes, and exchanged them for a rough, unadorned outfit. She put a hand to her chest, which rose and fell in time with her breath. Was it that man who had wiped her body clean? Or not? Truthfully, she didn’t care either way.

There was nothing left for her now. Nothing at all.

She had abandoned her home, her friends were gone, and her chastity had been stolen. She had no money, no equipment.

That’s not true.

She spotted something in a corner of the room, the corner where the man—Goblin Slayer—had first been sitting. Leather armor, battered and gouged, and her item pouch, now dirty.

The ache in her neck flared up.

“Goblin Slayer… One who kills goblins.”

It seemed the goblins hadn’t noticed that Noble Fencer had a false bottom sewn into her item pouch.

Traditionally, when using a rapier, one carries an object in the opposing hand that aids in defense.

What she had hidden in the very bottom of her item pouch was a second jeweled blade from her family home. It was an aluminum dagger forged by a lightning-hammer against a red gem.

§

“How is she?”

“Awake.”

As Goblin Slayer came down the stairs, Priestess questioned him with worry in her voice, but he responded nonchalantly.

Unlike during their earlier discussion, there were no villagers at the inn now.

Night had well and truly fallen by the time Goblin Slayer and the others came back. If the goblins were all dead, then there was no need for the villagers to spend the night in fearful vigilance. Their days of being tormented by the dark and the cold and the fear were over.

The only exception was the village chief. He had the misfortune of welcoming the adventurers and was the first to hear their report.

“The goblins appear to have built a separate nest.”

The headman could hardly be blamed for the way his jaw fell open. How was his village, here in the North, supposed to prepare for winter now? They had so little to spare. And now it had come to this. The goblins in the cave had been slain; the adventurers would be within their rights to consider the quest concluded. The villagers would have to go back to the Guild, file another quest, and pay another reward.

If they didn’t, the village would simply be destroyed.

Therefore, his relief was immense when Goblin Slayer announced that his party would continue to work on the goblins. But it didn’t resolve the village’s problem with provisions. The table the party sat around had only modest fare, mostly salted vegetables.

In a free space among the plates, a sheet of lambskin paper lay open. It was the map of the snowy mountain the trapper had given them prior to their attack on the cave. Goblin Slayer had the map arranged so that north was up from where he sat.

“Hey,” High Elf Archer said from under half-closed eyes. “Should we really be leaving her alone?”

“I don’t know.”

“What do you mean, you don’t know?”

“How could I know?” Goblin Slayer said, sounding a bit annoyed. He could be curt, and abrupt, and cold. But he almost never shouted. “What should I have said to her? ‘I’m sorry your friends are dead, but at least you survived’?”

This took the wind out of High Elf Archer’s sails. “Well… Well…” She opened her mouth, then closed it again, before finally saying, “There’s such a thing as the sensitive way to say things.”

Goblin Slayer’s reply was brief: “It doesn’t change what they mean.”

Come to think of it…

Priestess bit her lip gently. He had not tried to comfort her in her own case, either. Nor when they had rescued the injured elf adventurer from the ruins. He was always just…

The faint taste of blood was so bitter it almost brought tears to her eyes.

She glanced in Goblin Slayer’s direction, but he didn’t appear to notice.

“How is your injury? Does it affect your movement at all?”

High Elf Archer pursed her lips. Such bald changes of subject were a specialty of his. Then again, he was worried about her (even if his concern was mostly about slaying goblins!), and she couldn’t complain about that.

“…It’s fine. Even if it still hurts a little. I’ve gotten treatment for it.”

“I see.” A nod. His helmet rattled with the motion. “In that case, moving on to the provisioning of equipment. How are things going?”

“Mm.” Lizard Priest nodded somberly and patted the hempen bag sitting beside him. His chair, around which he had somehow managed to wrap his entire tail, creaked. “I have managed to obtain provisions—although they came rather dear, as I had to ask the villagers to draw from their own stockpiles.”

“There go our profits…again,” High Elf Archer said with a sigh. She was trying to sound frustrated, but a smile tugged at the corners of her lips. They had been together for close to a year now, and she had grown used to this. Although her resolve to take him on a real adventure had only strengthened as well.

“What’s this, then? Worried about money, Long-Ears? You’re not usually the type.” Dwarf Shaman laughed uproariously, whether or not he understood what High Elf Archer was really thinking. Not content with just the wine he used as a catalyst, he had gotten another cup to see him through this conversation. It was a tasteless, odorless, and strong spirit; the bottle had been buried in the snow and made into mead. Dwarf Shaman gulped it down.

High Elf Archer thought she would get a hangover just watching him. “Of course I am,” she said, glaring at the dwarf. “The rewards for killing goblins are measly!”

“Then again, we did manage to rescue an adventurer this time around,” Lizard Priest said.

“Well, it’s not every day you see five or six Silver-ranked adventurers out slaying goblins, is it?” Dwarf Shaman said.

“Er… I’m only Obsidian,” Priestess murmured, and smiled ambiguously.

She knew what it was like to be the only survivor of an annihilated party. She wanted to believe that she wasn’t forcing the interpretation—but she couldn’t help wondering how different she really was from that Noble Fencer.

She didn’t know if it was fate or chance… But each time she thought of the invisible dice rolled by the gods, she felt something like dregs accumulate in her heart.

“Say, I managed to get us some medicine,” Dwarf Shaman said. He drained his cup, poured, then drank again.

“That girl’s older sister…” Goblin Slayer paused for a second. “The medicine woman. We were told she’s inexperienced.”

“Maybe she can’t make us potions, but she said she would give us all the herbs we wanted,” Dwarf Shaman said with a broad grin. Then he stroked his beard. “Don’t you think she’s just the type for you? She’d make a nice little wife.”

“I have no idea.”

“Um…,” Priestess burst out, unable to contain herself.

Dwarf Shaman and Goblin Slayer, their conversation interrupted, looked at her, and Lizard Priest and High Elf Archer shortly followed.

“Um, well…” She squirmed under their collective gaze. “I just…wonder what we’re going to do next,” she ended lamely.

“Kill the goblins, of course.” Goblin Slayer’s answer was as cold as ever. He leaned over the table, eyeing the cups and plates that hemmed in his map. “Move the dishes.”

“You got it,” Dwarf Shaman said as if suddenly coming to himself; he grabbed a steamed potato off one of the plates and took a bite.

“Hey!” said High Elf Archer, who’d thought she had dibs on that food. She cleared the plates away looking very ill-used.

Worried that his liquor might be collected along with the rest of the dishes, Dwarf Shaman pulled his cup and bottle toward himself protectively.

Lizard Priest judged the sight of both of them to be “most amusing,” sticking out his tongue and pouring more wine into his empty cup.

“……”

When all was done, Priestess silently wiped the table down.

“Good,” Goblin Slayer said, nodding and rearranging the map on the tabletop. Then he took a writing utensil—just a piece of charcoal attached to a piece of wood—out of his item pouch and marked the location of the cave with an X.

“It’s obvious that cave was not their living quarters.”

“Yeah, it was definitely a chapel or something,” High Elf Archer said, sipping a bit of grape wine. “Although I still can’t quite believe it.”

“Believable or not, fact it appears to be. I think we must recognize as much. Still…” Lizard Priest gave a hissing sigh, closing his eyes. A second later, he opened one of them and looked at Priestess. She met his eyes and trembled. “…I wonder what our honored cleric thinks.”

“Oh! Uh… Um, yes…” Priestess quickly straightened up in her chair, gripping her sounding staff, which lay across her knees. It was clear that he was trying to show some consideration for her.

I have to respond.

She took a loud gulp of wine, licked her now-moist lips. “I agree with Goblin Slayer. It was…thirty?”

“Thirty-six,” Goblin Slayer put in. “That’s how many of them we slew.”

“I don’t think thirty-six of them could possibly all sleep there.”

“True, the place didn’t seem to have much in the way of food or wine or any of their other favorite things,” Dwarf Shaman said.

The word goblin was practically synonymous with the word stupid, but that didn’t mean they had no brains at all. The reason they had no technology for creating anything was because they tended to consider looting enough to meet their needs. But the same could not be said of the caves they lived in. If they had stolen a house, or some ruins, some preexisting structure, that might have been a different matter. But a cave…

Goblins, in their own nasty way, would prepare storehouses, sleeping places, and trash heaps. At the very least, one would have expected to find the scraps of one of their great feasts lying around, but the adventurers had discovered no such remains. They had found only that stone altar, a place that seemed like a chapel, and a woman about to be offered up…

“This suggests that their main habitation is elsewhere,” Goblin Slayer said, circling on the map a hilltop beyond the mountains. “According to the locals, there are some old ruins at some point higher than where we climbed.”

“Chances are very strong that the goblins are based there.” Lizard Priest nodded. “Do you have any sense what kind of ruins they are?”

“A dwarven fortress.”

“Hmm,” Dwarf Shaman murmured at this mention of his race; he took another mouthful of mead. “One of my people’s fortresses from the Age of the Gods, is it? That means a frontal assault would risk life and limb, Beard-cutter. Shall we try fire?”

“I have a small amount of gasoline,” Goblin Slayer said, withdrawing a bottle filled with black liquid from his bag. “But I presume the fortress is made of stone. A fire attack from the outside would not set it alight.”

“From the outside…,” Priestess repeated, tapping a finger against her lip. “What about from the inside, then?”

“A fine plan,” Lizard Priest said immediately, opening his jaws and nodding. He ran a claw along the sheepskin map, tracing their marching route carefully. “Castles infiltrated by the enemy are and have always been vulnerable.”

“But how are we going to get inside? I’m sure we can’t just walk in the front door,” Priestess said with a sound of distress.

At that, though, High Elf Archer’s ears stood straight up, and she leaned well forward. “So you want to sneak into a fortress!” She looked positively giddy. She kept murmuring, “Right, right,” to herself, her ears bouncing in time to her contemplations. “Right! This is almost starting to feel like a real adventure. Great!”

“Th-this is…an adventure?”

“Sure is,” High Elf Archer said in her bright, cheerful way. She was naturally upbeat, although it was possible she was putting on an encouraging front. Nothing said you had to act depressed just because you were in a depressing situation.

“Ancient mountains deep in the wilderness! A towering fortress controlled by some powerful ringleader! And we sneak in and take him out!”

If that isn’t adventure, what is it?

High Elf Archer offered this explanation with much waving and gesturing, then looked pointedly at Goblin Slayer.

“I guess we’re not exactly fighting a Demon Lord or anything…but it’s not classic goblin slaying for sure.”

“It’s not quite infiltration, either,” Goblin Slayer muttered. “The enemy will know there are adventurers around. We must approach cautiously.”

“You have a plan?” Dwarf Shaman asked.

“I just thought of one.” Goblin Slayer looked at them. His expression was masked by his helmet, but he seemed to be looking at his two clerics.

“Are disguises against your religion?”

“Hmmm. I wonder,” Lizard Priest said, his eyes rolling in his head. Then his reptilian eyes fixed on Priestess and glinted mischievously. She took his meaning and smiled gently herself.

I can’t just let everyone baby me all the time.

“I—I think it depends on the time and the situation.”

“All right.” Goblin Slayer fished in his item pouch and, at length, pulled something out. It rolled across the table, over the map, and then toppled.

It was the brand bearing the sign of the evil eye.

“Since they were so kind as to leave us a clue, I could hardly refuse to pursue it.”

“Ha-ha. Very clever,” Lizard Priest said with a clap of his scaled hands. He seemed to understand what was going on. “Become a member of the Evil Sect. Mm, very well.”

“Yes.”

“I am a lizardman who serves the Dark God. My disciple is a warrior, and we are accompanied by a dwarven mercenary…”

“I guess that makes me a dark elf!” High Elf Archer said with a catlike grin. Then she turned to Priestess. “I’ll have to color my body with ink. Hey, maybe you could put on some false ears! We could be twins!”

“Huh? Oh—huh? Will I—will I have to color myself, too?”

Suddenly Priestess didn’t know where to look. High Elf Archer zipped around her, all smiles.

“It’s better than goblin gore, right?”

“I don’t think that’s saying much…!”

Given the freedom to choose, she wouldn’t have picked either of those things. But if it came down to it…

Goblin Slayer glanced at the two chattering girls, then turned back to the other men. Lizard Priest narrowed his eyes ever so slightly.

“They are two fine young women.”

“Yes,” Goblin Slayer said with a nod, “I know.”

If he had to do something outrageous or unbelievable to achieve victory, he would. If he had to become depressed or serious in order to fight effectively, he would do it.

But the reality was different. Laughter and cheer: the whole party recognized how important those things were.

“Now then, I suppose we must decide what we will do in the manner of disguise,” Lizard Priest said.

“It would be inconvenient for the goblins to discover we were adventurers,” Goblin Slayer said. “Whatever else we do, we must change what we’re wearing.”

“Pfah,” Dwarf Shaman said with a cackle, his breath stinking of alcohol. “If you don’t mind ’em well used, I’ve got a few outfits.”

“Oh-ho. You are a dwarf of many talents, master spell caster.”

“Good food and wine, good music and song, and something beautiful to wear. If you’ve got all that plus the company of a fine woman, you’ve got everything you need to enjoy life.” He settled back with another cup of the mead in hand and closed his eyes. “I can handle cooking, music, song, and sewing on my own. As for a woman, there’s always the courtesans in town.”

“Goodness. You’ve no wife, then?” Lizard Priest looked rather surprised, but Dwarf Shaman answered, “Indeed I don’t. I thought I’d spend another hundred years or so enjoying bachelorhood, playing the bon viveur.”

Lizard Priest chuckled, sticking his tongue out and sipping happily at his drink. “Master spell caster, how very young you seem. It’s enough to make an old lizard jealous.”

“Ah, but I do believe I’m older than you.” He held out the wine jar invitingly; Lizard Priest nodded and held up his cup.

Goblin Slayer was next. He grunted, “Mm,” and simply held up his cup. Alcohol sloshed into it.

“You all just make sure to enjoy your lives,” the shaman said, adding, “Be it with goblins or gods or what have you.” Then he settled back to appreciate his wine.

His gaze settled on the two chattering young women.

“Laugh, cry, rage, enjoy—the long-eared girl is good at those, isn’t she?”

“…”

Goblin Slayer looked into his cup, saying nothing. A cheap-looking helmet stared back at him from the wine, tinged with the orangish color of the lamps. He raised the cup to that helmet and drained it in one gulp. His throat and stomach felt like they were burning.

He let out a breath. Just like he did when he was on a long path, looking behind, looking ahead, and continuing on.

“It is never so simple,” he said.

“No, I don’t suppose it is,” the dwarf responded.

“Is it not?” asked Lizard Priest. “I guess you’re right.”

The three men laughed without making a sound.

It was only then that the girls noticed them, looking at them with puzzlement.

“What’s up?” asked High Elf Archer.

“Is something wrong?” said Priestess.

Dwarf Shaman waved away their questions, and after giving things a moment to settle down, Goblin Slayer said:

“Now. About the goblins.”

“Ah-ha! So we come to it, Beard-cutter.” Dwarf Shaman shook the droplets off his beard and shifted in his seat. “I s’pose this paladin-like fellow is their leader. That’s if he really exists, of course.”

“Yes.” Goblin Slayer nodded. “I’ve never fought such a goblin, either.”

“The question is, just how smart is he?”

“He was able to imitate my devices, at least.” Goblin Slayer took the arrowhead out of his bag, rolling it around in his hand. It was stained with High Elf Archer’s blood. It gave him a dark feeling. “And if we can destroy thirty-six of them in one expedition, it means our foe is many.”

“So, mean little brains and lots of ’em? Sounds like another day’s work with goblins,” Dwarf Shaman said.

Things at the harvest festival had somehow gone in their favor, but that was because they knew the terrain and had made preparations. Even if there were no more enemies than there had been at the farm, the adventurers numbered only five. Fighting in hostile territory seemed rather unmanageable.

Lizard Priest, who had been listening quietly, made a rumble in his throat, then said seriously, “And there is one more problem.” He struck the floor with his tail, stretched out his arms, and tapped the claw on the newer mark Goblin Slayer had made on the map. “Specifically, if we should be so fortunate as to get into the enemy’s fortifications, what do we do from there?”

“Ah, about that,” Goblin Slayer said. “If we do manage to get in—”

Criiiick.

No sooner had he spoken than there was a sound of creaking wood. Immediately, the adventurers all reached for their weapons.

They held their collective breath. The innkeeper had retired much earlier.

Slowly, the creaking became quiet footsteps. Someone came down the stairs, then exhaled.

“Goblins…?”

The voice was strained, almost like a sigh. It came from Noble Fencer, who stood clutching the railing of the staircase, swaying unsteadily. She wore tattered armor over her light bedclothes, and in her hand a silver dagger glittered in the light.

Mithril…? No, the color’s too light. A magical item of some sort, perhaps…?

Dwarf Shaman found himself squinting at the gleam. To think that it should be something that he, a friend of metal, had never seen.

“……Then… I’m coming, too.”

“No way!” High Elf Archer was the first to respond. “We came to rescue you because of the quest your parents posted.” She looked into Noble Fencer’s eyes with characteristic elven directness. Those eyes were deep and dark, like the bottom of a well—or so they seemed to her.

The mention of her parents didn’t seem to stir so much as a ripple in Noble Fencer.

There was an intake of breath, ever so slight.

“Before you put your life in danger again, don’t you think you should at least go home and talk to them?” High Elf Archer said.

“……No. I can’t do that.” Noble Fencer shook her head, her honey-colored hair shaking. “……I have to get it back.”

Lizard Priest put his hands together in a strange shape, resting his chin atop them. With his eyes closed, he appeared half as if in prayer, half as if enduring some pain. Quietly, he asked:

“And what might it be?”

“Everything,” Noble Fencer answered firmly. “Everything I’ve lost.”

Dreams. Hopes. Futures. Chastity. Friends. Comrades. Equipment. A sword.

All that the goblins stole from her and took away into the depths of their gloomy hole.

“I cannot say I do not understand,” Lizard Priest said after a moment, his breath hissing. Noble Fencer was talking about pride, about a way of life. Lizard Priest brought his palms together in a strange gesture. “A naga has his pride precisely because he is a naga. If he has no pride, he is no longer a naga.”

“Ju-just a second…!” High Elf Archer said. Lizard Priest was so calm and collected—although, come to think of it, he did seem to like combat. The elf’s ears had drooped with pity, but now they sprang back up. “Dwarf! Say something!”

“Why shouldn’t we let her do as she wishes?” the shaman said.

“Guh?!”

Yet another un-elf-like sound (she seemed to have an ever-increasing repertoire) came from High Elf Archer’s throat.

Dwarf Shaman paid her no mind but, shaking the last drop out of the bottle of mead, said, “Our quest was to rescue her. It’s up to her what she does after that.”

“Et tu, dwarf?! What if she dies, huh?! What then?”

“You might die, yourself. Or me. Or any of us.” He drained that final cup and wiped his mouth. “Every living thing dies one day. You elves should know that better than anybody.”

“Well… Well yeah, but…”

Droop went the ears again. High Elf Archer looked around with an expression like a lost child who didn’t know what to do next.

Priestess met her eyes, and it almost prevented the girl from saying what she said next. She looked at the ground, bit her lip, quietly drank the last of the wine in her cup. If she hadn’t, Priestess didn’t think she could have gotten the words out. “Let’s… Let’s take her along.”

If she didn’t say them, no one else would.

“If… If we don’t…”

She can’t be saved.

Without a doubt, there will be no salvation for her.

Priestess herself had been that way, once.

And—she suspected—so had he.

“I…,” he—Goblin Slayer—began, picking his words very carefully, “…am not your parents, nor am I a friend.”

Noble Fencer said nothing.

“You know what should be done when you have a quest in mind.”

“I do.”

“Hey!”

But almost before High Elf Archer had gotten the word out of her mouth, there was an unpleasant tearing sound.

The golden hair went flying through the air.

“………Your reward. I’m paying in advance.”

She took a lock of the hair she had just cut off. She cut another lock with her dagger—another tearing sound—and set it on the table. The two tails of her hair, once tied with ribbon, were now cruelly lost.

“………I’m going, too.”

Her hair was brutally short now, her lips drawn back in determination—the very image of someone bent on vengeance.

Priestess heard a soft grunt from inside Goblin Slayer’s helmet.

“Goblin Slayer…sir…?”

“What can you do?”

He ignored Priestess’s look, instead flinging this question at Noble Fencer.

Without hesitation, the girl responded, “I can use the sword. And a spell. Lightning.”

The helmet turned, looked at Dwarf Shaman.

“Summoning thunder,” he said disinterestedly. “Very powerful stuff, like a cannon.”

“…Very well,” Goblin Slayer said softly. Then he asked, “You don’t mind?”

The helmet turned toward High Elf Archer, who was looking at him beseechingly. Now, she averted her eyes; she clutched her cup with both hands and looked at the floor. Finally, she rubbed the outer corners of her eyes with her arms and looked up piteously. She said only: “If you’re all right with it, Orcbolg.”

“Good.” Goblin Slayer rolled up the map and stood.

It was clear what had to be done.

It was the same thing that always had to be done.

Always and everywhere.

No matter what.

It was what he had done for the past ten years.

“Then let us go goblin slaying.”





“Yikes! Cold! It’s cold!” Despite her yelp, Cow Girl looked quite happy as she pushed open the door of the Guild. “There’s even snow falling!”

It’s winter, all right! With those words, she came into the Guild’s waiting area, brushing the white powder off her clothes. The few adventurers inside were sitting on the long bench, warming themselves by the fire in the hearth. The small number was partly down to the time of day—and partly to the simple fact that not too many people wanted to go adventuring in winter.

It was cold, it wasn’t easy to camp out, there was snow, it was dangerous—and, oh yes: it was cold.

Stories spoke of barbarians from far beyond the northern mountains who were not the least bothered by cold like this, who claimed that this was the season when weak civilized peoples clung to what was warm.

As Cow Girl walked through the balmy room, she let out a breath. Most adventurers, eager for money as they were, saved up from spring through fall so that they could pass the winter without working.

That didn’t necessarily mean, though, that the adventurers here now were just bad at saving. Adventurers might rest in the winter, but Non-Praying Characters didn’t: goblins, fallen spirits, and monsters were still abroad.

Then, too, there were ruins whose gates opened only in the season of snows, and hidden treasures to find. Those undergoing harsh training, explorers, or adventurers of races not susceptible to the cold didn’t stop their work simply because it was winter.

In fact, a dearth of adventurers meant more quests to go around during the winter—something of which we’ve spoken before.

“It certainly is winter, indeed,” said Cow Girl’s friend Guild Girl, picking up on the words the farmer had muttered to herself.

Cow Girl made a sound of puzzlement to see her friend looking out the window with a melancholy gaze, her chin on her hands. “What’s wrong?” she asked. Someone passed her a menu as she spoke.

“Nothing,” Guild Girl said with an enigmatic smile. “I was just…watching the snow come down.”

“Oh…”

Drawn by the remark, Cow Girl looked out the window as well. It might be easy to miss if you were out in the middle of the swirling stuff yourself, but from inside this room it was genuinely beautiful.

Soon, the fluffy flakes would cover the town in white.

“I hope he’s okay…”

Guild Girl was only whispering to herself; she didn’t say who she hoped would be okay, or what he was doing that put him in danger.

It didn’t stop Cow Girl from putting a hand to her ample bosom and whispering, “He’ll be fine.” Then she added, “I think he’s been to the snowy mountain before.”

“Oh really?” Guild Girl said, blinking at this unexpected new information. “I didn’t know that. So he’s been there before…”

“He never did tell me what he was doing there, though.”

Everyone has certain things they don’t want to talk about. He was always taciturn, and although it sometimes made her feel a little lonely, Cow Girl was willing to live with it.

After all, there are things I haven’t told him, either.

She returned the menu with a word of thanks and tucked away her feelings into that expansive chest of hers.

“Ugh! Cold, cold, cold! That freeze is enough to hurt! I know that guy was only using his fists, but…!”

“He was…the descendent…of Frost Giants, wasn’t he?”

“That fight was too long and altogether too painful.”





The door of the Guild opened, two familiar faces entering along with a gust of wind.

One of the adventurers was a handsome man with a spear leaning on his shoulder; the other a witch whose outfit left little of her generous figure to the imagination.

They shook off the snow in the doorway, then Spearman—his hair carefully coiffed—breezily approached Guild Girl.

“Ahh. You always get back before he does,” Guild Girl said, sighs mingling with her pasted-on smile. “I’m glad you’re safe, of course.”

Cow Girl got to her feet. “Good luck with work.”

“Thanks. I’ll work my hardest.” There was a pause, then, “I don’t hate him, you know?”

“He’s just not my favorite,” she whispered, and Cow Girl smiled at her.

“I think everything will work out fine.”

“How do you mean?”

“He’ll be back before we celebrate the passing of the year.”

I’m sure of it.





“I did not agree to this!”

“Ah… Ah-ha-ha-ha-ha…”

The next morning, High Elf Archer was traveling down the mountain path…enclosed in a wooden cage. Priestess was beside her, smiling awkwardly. Both of them were dressed in rags.

The elf’s long ears were twitching angrily; she grabbed the bars of the cage and gave them a rattle.

The pole that ran through the top of the cage so that it could be carried was, like their outfits, all part and parcel of making the “prisoners” look realistic.

“Why do we have to be the spoils of battle?!”

“Because I and the others never would be.”

With the men as captives, the act would no longer be convincing. Goblin Slayer offered no harbor in this storm.

He had dyed his always-grimy armor black from head to toe; it was a very strange sight. He could have passed for the spirit of some dead soldier recently back from the grave.

“Ho! Oh! The foolish lady adventurers begin to rail again!” said an evil-looking dwarf who was carrying the cage from the front. “Master monk, perhaps we should teach them a lesson…”

“Heh-heh-heh! Fine offerings they will make to the god of external knowledge. I shall let you do what you wish with them.” The response came from a dark lizard monk who walked ahead, smiling maliciously. He had been quite enthusiastic ever since his disguise had been prepared and he had painted his face and scales, using pigment to cover them in uncanny patterns.

High Elf Archer bit her lip with a growl and changed targets.

“Hey, you know it’s okay to be a little angrier!!”

“Oh, I think…I’ve sort of gotten used to this kind of thing…” Priestess, sitting in one corner of the cage hugging her knees, smiled in defeat. The expression, combined with her willowy body and delicate beauty, made her look the very picture of a prisoner. A fine performance. Of course, the real problem was that it wasn’t a performance at all.

“…”

The cage had one other inhabitant, someone who hadn’t said a word. It was Noble Fencer.

She, too, sat in a corner of the cage with her legs drawn up to her chest—whence she stared into space and didn’t move a muscle.

Her fair skin, however, had lost its luster; her rose-tinted lips had turned blue.

Priestess came over to her slowly, moving on all fours.

“Um, aren’t you cold…?”

“……I’m fine,” Noble Fencer said simply.

Normally, that might have been enough to deter Priestess, but this time she only giggled a little bit.

It was a better response than Sure or I see or Is that so? or All right, then.

She thought back to how he had been when they first met; he wouldn’t have offered more than one of those.

“Me, I’m cold… So I’m going to keep close to you, okay?”

“……Do what you want.”

Noble Fencer looked away pointedly. Priestess nodded, even though the fighter couldn’t see her, then drew her knees up like the other girl.

The snowy path seemed very long. The cage swayed back and forth in the blizzard.

They were marching toward the fortress that towered upon the snowy mountain. It was not something that would be easy or pleasant for the women to reach on foot.

So…were they trying to be kind by making us play prisoners?





There was insensitive, and then there was insensitive, Priestess thought, holding gently to Noble Fencer’s shoulders.

“Hachoo!” Someone gave a dainty sneeze from the cold.

She tried to cover her red face with her mouth, but it was too late. The elf’s sharp ears had picked up the direction of the sound, in which she now looked with a grin. Noble Fencer was staring at Priestess in a way that was not very ladylike.

“I… I couldn’t help it. It’s cold out.”

“……Yes. It is,” Noble Fencer muttered, but there was a hint of a smile at the edges of her lips. Priestess was sure of it.

Ohhh…

Part of her was proud to have evoked this reaction—but she was a little too embarrassed to consider it a lucky break.

“You’re right, though,” High Elf Archer said, the color of her face uninspiring. “It really is cold out here, especially in this getup.” Her ears twitched restlessly. “I think my ears are going to freeze clean off.”

“They don’t call it the snowy mountain for nothing,” Goblin Slayer said from outside the cage. He signaled Dwarf Shaman to stop. Then he reached into his item pouch and pulled out a blanket, although its usefulness against the cold was minimal.

“It’s a bitter wind,” Dwarf Shaman said. “What do you say, Scaly—er, monk?”

“I myself must dress warmly lest I be rendered immobile.” The lizardman was wearing his normal outfit, augmented with a very heavy cloak. He narrowed his eyes slightly. “Some say the fearsome nagas were annihilated by the chill.”

“Racial weakness, eh? No helping it, then. What say we get a fire going and warm our bones?”

Dwarf Shaman reached into his bag of catalysts for a flint, along with one or two large stones.

“Dancing flame, salamander’s fame. Grant us a share of the very same.”

No sooner had he intoned the words than the stones in his hand began to glow gently from within. The casting of Kindle consumed one of his spells—but none of them considered it a waste.

“The stones won’t burn, just warm up, so—yipes! Hot, hot! It’s a good compromise.”

“I’ve got some very bad memories of that spell,” High Elf Archer said, reflexively covering her leg. Dwarf Shaman snorted.

“If you don’t like it, I don’t have to give you one.”

Shortly thereafter, the rocks were nicely heated; Dwarf Shaman wrapped them in cloth with a practiced hand and placed them in the cage. Even High Elf Archer, who had looked none too pleased just a moment before, accepted a stone, blinking.

“Er, thanks. You’re pretty considerate, for a dwarf.”

“Th-thank you…!” Priestess said.

“…”

Each of the three had her own reaction. Dwarf Shaman simply thumped his belly with a ’Tis nothing!, causing High Elf Archer to sigh.

“You could stand to be a little more open about your feelings,” the dwarf said. “Still and all. Beard-cutter, got anything for us?”
